
                   I am taking Dr. Hogan's Monetary and Banking Theory class. He is really a nice person and great professor. Explaining thing very clear and detailed, and the best part of his class is that he encourage you the think about and tell you some new thoughts about central bank and monetary system, which none of the professors in WT have told before.
                
                   Really good teacher. I had him his first year teaching at WT so the first few weeks were a little rough because he wasn't familiar with everything yet, but overall a great teacher. He explains the concepts well and relates them to what's happening in the world currently. Just take notes and look over the study guides and you should ace the class :)
                
                   Good teacher. Curves tests.
                
                   He makes class interesting and he actually cares about the students
                
                   No Comments
                
                   A good and funny lecturer. However, his political views are obvious. He is a conservative and likes to bashing Marxism. Oh well, political views don't judge the quality of the professor.
                
                   Good teacher, easy to understand and comprehend
                
                   He is very unorganized and his lecturers are hard to follow. He jumps from one example to another and make it harder than it really has to be. But you get good knowledge for your future career. 
                
                   Summer class was more like a CLEP class no active teaching.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Very excellent professor. Smart, fun, and easy to listen to. Very helpful
                
                   Great Professor. But he's too good for his own good. Is on a whole different level of Economics. Has a passion for what he does. Will need to pay close attention. He's hilarious as well. Using the book is must if you want to pass this class.
                
                   Would not take this professor again ,very unclear and just lectures the whole class and information doesn't stick ! 
                
                   Tests are hard. He will let you revise home work.
                
                   Can be a bully.  Won't take him again if I can help it.
                
                   Pretty easy going go. Not a terribly tough class, pay attention during lectures. No textbook needed.
                
                   She's condescending and rude, she is also the worst teacher in my experience. She bemoans at the beginning of class how no one asks her questions, so when you do she mocks you for your ignorance and then proceeds to talk to you like you are a four-year old who's wasting her precious time. I got an A because I have a good memory, she didn't teach.
                
                   Yes, it is easy just like the first comment said. However, I didn't learn anything. Just got an &quot;A&quot; but didn't learn anything from the course. Her lectures are boring. Too bad, WTAMU's selection of ECO 202 professors is not as good as 201.
                
                   Fairly easy class, but a drag. Puts you in groups to take practice tests together all semester. They count as a grade, but are somewhat difficult. Makes the tests from questions on those. Makes you go to her office to study them. Still don't know why.
                
                   Great teacher, Take this prof. Low homework load, Great Lectures. Not easy but at least its interesting
                
                   One of the best Profs. that WTAMU has. Sign up for his class before its full. Lectures very entertaining and content is just right. A+++++
                
                   You are going to have to earn your grade, but you will learn that economics isn't nearly as dry as you might think. Does not project the school of thought he most sympathzes with, which allows you to evaluate it on your own. Is always available to answer questions...and is the greatest advisor! He really cares about the students suceeding.
                
                   A++ instructor, very helpful, excellent material
                
                   He's a tough one, but you'll learn more than you ever thought possible...
                
                   No Comments
                
                   No Comments
                
                   You'll Learn alot from any of his classes
                
                   Going to class is helpful because even though she posts her notes, the examples and some things are missing. There are a few online homeworks, but they are easy 100s. She will make practice tests before each exam, they are extremely helpful. Reading the book isn't really necessary, but it's a good resource for studying. The final is optional.
                
                   Fantastic class to take. Most of the people in there were not econ majors to my knowledge but everyone still loved the class. She cares about the students and wants to give everyone a great experience.
                
                   She is fantastic. If you have the chance to take her for an economics class, do it. While her class was pretty easy, it was also extremely informative. Even though getting a good grade doesn't require too much effort, by the end of the class, you will have a good understanding of microeconomics just because of how great a teacher she is.
                
                   Such an easy, fun class. Lectures are never boring.
                
                   Very nice and respectful to students. She was genuine about the subject matter and made every effort so that everyone could learn well. Lenient when it came to grading.
                
                   Billur was a great professor! She made a boring subject, a ton of fun! She went above and beyond for her students. There were plenty of opportunities to help your grade. Homework was online and could be completed several times to get a 100!  She helped with test prep by offering review sessions in class.  Best Prof I have had at TAMU!!
                
                   Billur was a great professor!! She really cares about her students. She holds extra office hours and even offers some extra credit and it helped me a lot at the end with my grade! She makes lectures interesting and she gives real examples and loves when students participate in things, take her!!!
                
                   She is amazing and made ECON fun. She gives lots of real life examples. She drops the lowest homework and exam grades. She also gives opportunities to get bonus points. She held office hours in the library and she also held a lot of office hours in her office (by appointment mostly). She was always there and extremely helpful. 
                
                   My favorite professor this semester!! She truly cares about her students and offers SO MANY different helps. She even held extra office hours in the library for students and had final reviews. She gave lots of extra credit opportunities and I would take another one of her classes if I can. She makes learning econ easy and uses real world examples.
                
                   She is an awesome professor. She provides lots of resources to help students succeed, and you can really tell that she cares about the subject.
                
                   Billur is an awesome professor! She really cares that you're learning  and offers many opportunities to provide help if needed. She drops your lowest test grade and homework which is really helpful and provides a couple extra credit assignments. She made the class fun and interesting. If I had the opportunity to take her again, I definitely would!
                
                   Billur is a great professor! She is very helpful if you go to office hours and cares a whole lot about her students. If I had the opportunity to take her again I would. She does a great job of finding real world examples to explain theories and tries to make class as fun as possible. The tests are pretty easy as long as you show up to class.
                
                   She's a nice professor as well as loves to help others. She holds study groups for the final and it will help tramendously if you go! Overall good class!
                
                   Billur Aksoy was an amazing professor. She really cares about each and everyone of her students. The most important things to her are your success and understanding. The average on the tests was always a B, but most of the class gets an A. She only uses the best out of your three tests (so the final is optional) and drops your lowest homework, too.
                
                   DO NOT TAKE HIM, literally take anyone else but him if you want to do good in this class, he thinks you should know every single detail from your principles class. He is soooooo boring... save yourself please I don't know why people recommended him...
                
                   Moves really fast, expects you to remember everything from prerequisite classes, can barley read his handwriting 
                
                   I only got a B in this class thanks to 4.0 & go. If i hadn't gone to them I probably would have failed
                
                   Unwilling to help you. Doesn't post test reviews when he says he will. Weekly recaps are rediculous. If you are in this class your only chance is to go to 4.0 and go tutoring or some other method of tutoring. 
                
                   There are only 3 tests - no homework, no final.  You MAY be okay if you are an ECON major & understand a lot about it - but you will probably get confused still. Thinks every bit of the math used comes from "HS Algebra".  Lectures are basically him just writing down stuff how he thinks about it.  No explanations. 4.0 and Go is worth it!!
                
                   This guy doesn't help you at all. He'll start off a problem and say "with a little 8th grade math" you get the answer; he doesn't show you how to work it. I got a B, but I owe it all to 4.0 and go. Good luck!
                
                   This guy is awkward and he doesn't help you at all. He'll start off a problem and say "with a little 8th grade math" you get the answer (he doesn't show you how to work it). I got a B, but I owe it all to 4.0 and go. I stopped going to class and started only going to tutoring after the first test. Good luck!
                
                   great class...although a bit challenging at times
                
                   Brilliant Prof dedicated to excellence. Good guy all around. Learned from him 27 years ago and never forgot him or his class. = )
                
                   very much a chilipepper!!!!
                
                   all math...just be prepared
                
                   Narrow minded not very intelligent just find the other teachers
                
                   Rude, unhelpful, stuck up! Do not take does not help any students out, feels his research is more important, is very unapproachable and cannot give any good advise, highly recommend other Econ professor
                
                   Dr. Anderson, is not very approachable. He seems like he would rather be doing research instead of teaching. However, you get this man in a classroom and he will wow your mind. He is very easy to understand (hence the high clarity rating), but be prepared to work and don't be late for his class - he has zero tolerance for tardiness. Good Luck...
                
                   stifling and confusing for about three weeks.  excellent prof with high expectations but well worth the work and time spent in class.
                
                   Condescending, rude, chip on his shoulder, narrow minded, etc.  All of which interferes with his teaching ability.  Laughs inappropriately.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Dr. Brown likes students who work hard and is willing to help them.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   His first time teaching experience but portrays himself as better-than tenured professor. His lecture notes copied onto the chalkboard from his written notes copied from the textbook. In the process transcription errors manifold. Unable to answer even the simplest of questions if not in notes. Totally unhelpful and unavailable for any assistance
                
                   He was a great prof and extremely helpful.  We were his first ever teaching but he taught it as if he had known how to teach all his life.  If you have an opportunity to take him do.
                
                   Foreign dialect, but presents his material fairly and explains things well. Most people are discouraged by the hard material, but I still got an A.
                
                   worst professor you'll ever have. Can't speak English, is a negative unhelpful person, and has really hard tests that do not correspond to what he talks about in class. Oh yeah, doesn't give good grades either.
                
                   very tricky tests
                
                   Makes you feel stupid for asking questions, requires you to teach yourself at home then doesn't go over it in class, homework every night and over the break, overall try to avoid this professor.
                
                   Avoid this professor at all costs!  Uses a teaching style were you teach yourself at home and come to class to go over problems, which you really don't even do.  Tests are impossible and doesn't really pertain to the loads of homework you do.  You will have 2 homework's due each class period, and 5 old finals as homework over thanksgiving.
                
                   This guy is full of himself. If you want to have any free time in college DO NOT take this professor he is absolutely horrible. He assigns homework every night for a grade. The most kind thing he has done all semester is assigning a 29 PAGE homework assignment over thanksgiving. his test are also impossible. he curves your grade 40 points though
                
                   Lectures are pretty dry and she speaks fairly quickly, but her slides are available online. The book is a very good supplement if you want to truly understand the subject material, and an access code for Pearson is necessary for the HW. Overall a very easy B, and with a little effort you can get an A easily.
                
                   Terrible teacher,  leads you to believe his class is easier than it is. Tests are nothing like lecture, sneaky questions from textbook portions that arent assigned.  GET OUT OF HIS CLASS!!! If you cant go to 4.0 & go and pray!
                
                   DO NOT TAKE THIS PROFESSOR This was definitely the worst experience I have had with a professor at Texas A&M, for multiple reasons. He was rude and sarcastic, and offered virtually no help. He did not care whatsoever if his students were successful.
                
                   HE IS AWFUL. For the first 2 tests you can go to 4.0 and go and get the exact test and it's fine and dandy, then you get to the final and you absolutely bomb it and it is absolutely nothing like you have seen. No one goes to class because it doesn't help you anyway. For anybody else I would say this is dramatic but not Hanson, DO NOT TAKE HIM!!!!!!
                
                   I would honestly avoid him at all possible costs. If you have to take him be prepared because during add drop week he will tell you he doesn't call students out, but he definitely does. And when you answer or ask a question he will point out how dumb you are and will make you feel awful about yourself. I highly recommend not taking him. 
                
                   Read all the reviews saying not to take this prof and ended up with no other choice - almost switched out during adddrop but decided to buckle down and stick it out. He really is a huge A hole, lectures have barely any useful information and even reading everything in the book I still fail tests. AVOID AVOID AVOID
                
                   He is SUPER old school, only uses the chalk board, AND NEVER USES ANY PROMPTS. It is very hard to learn about supply and demand grafts when he never draws them out and only talks about them. He is an absolute A hole when it comes to lectures. If you answer the question incorrectly I feel he gets enjoyment out of humiliating you. DO NOT TAKE  CLASS!
                
                   Aggies be warne Hanson is an olderold fashioned prof. Fine. But his lectures dont relate to the tests, he loves to arguehumiliate students, and seems like a miserable old guy. The tests are extremely tricky- dont think he wants anyone to pass. TERRIBLE class.  Take this class @ a community college online- anything 's better than Hanson
                
                   DO NOT TAKE THIS CLASS. This professor is old school and only uses the chalkboard. He is not helpful, at all, so don't bother going to his office hours or asking any questions really. Also don't share your opinion in class if it contradicts his own. More than half of the class dropped, and a lot of people failed. Tests were very hard.
                
                   I liked Long. He's a graduate student, but he knows what he's doing. He's kind, willing to help, and is always prompt with grading an giving us information. His tests are easy to prepare for, and are relatively simple (with a few crinkles), and are well-written. The biggest downside is he can be difficult to understand in lecture at times.
                
                   LITERALLY IMPOSSIBLE TO UNDERSTAND IN LECTURE. You will learn nothing in lecture, but he gives extra credit just for showing up. There are weekly homeworks online that are basically completion grades and  his test reviews are almost the exact test. His class is basically independent study, but between the homework and extra credit, it's an easy A.
                
                   The biggest problem was understanding what he was trying to say. The exams aren't too hard and he does practice exams online so those help. It can be a lot of reading but if you do your reading you'll pass. he posts everything online and it was more of a self taught class because I couldn't understand his accent.
                
                   Long has an accent that is pretty hard to understand, but he posts all of his powerpoints online so going to class is definitely not mandatory. Read over the slides, do the online homework, read the book if you get confused, and always do the practice exam. His class isn't too hard and failing is not likely. 
                
                   She is super young, but very intelligent. I just can't understand the way she teaches, she only does lectures and it's really hard to pay attention.
                
                   Nataliya is a really nice lady and truly wants you to do well. Her accent is not difficult to understand. The class is pretty easy if you attend lecture and know how to do the homework, which is the majority of the test. She gives extra credit if you come to class and participate in the review questions before each class.
                
                   She has an accent but after a while you get used to it. Very good instructor and the structure of the class is simple. Read before class, show up, do the homework (not much, very easy), study a bit before the test, get an A. It's not an easy class, but its a simple process. She's very nice too, if you get to know her.
                
                   She has an accent but if you sit in the first few rows you'll be able to understand her. The HW is easy most of the time and you can do it three times until you make a good grade. She gives one extra credit assignment and it brought me up almost 4 points to make an A. I would take her again because she definitely helps you out the best she can.
                
                   Some people don't like Pakhotina because of her accent but honestly you get used to it. She gives you worksheets and works through them in class which is really helpful and the online homework is super easy (besides, you get 3 tries) so that's an easy A for 25% of your grade. Tests aren't hard if you study a couple days before and she curves tests
                
                   She has an accent that really makes or breaks your semester. Her tests are based off her lectures and if you go to class you should do ok. She does curve her tests, but don't rely on those too much. There is HW, but it is so easy you dont have to worry about it. Overall an ok to average professor.
                
                   She has an accent that can really make or break your semester. Her  class is just three tests along with some homework. HW is easy and you shouldn't worry too much but her tests are relatively hard. She does give a curve, but you won't pass if you're relying on that curve.
                
                   Don't take her. There were three exams, and homework is 10% of your grade. She has a thick accent, but that's easy to get used to. She isn't a good teacher though. She doesn't do a good job teaching in class, and her tests are hard. She only curved the final exam. She doesn't make clear what you need to understand.
                
                   Beware of the accent (It gets better with time). Overall, not a bad professor. UTILIZE MYECONLAB. The chapter resources are what helped me big time for the tests. Weekly homeworks and three tests with around 30 questions each. She teaches REALLY fast. I usually read the book and watched the summary videos on MYECONLAB. They really helped me.
                
                   Great Professor. Three regular tests and homework and one extra credit assignment. Didn't give a final this semester. Going to class isn't mandatory, but makes the class a lot easier because she gives practice questions.
                
                   I took this class as a freshman, and it was my hardest class by far. Her accent wasn't bad to understand, but her tests were almost impossible to do well on. The homework and extra credit assignment is what saved me (barely). 
                
                   Professor Nataliya makes attendance optional, but I recommend attending anyway.  She gives out worksheets in class and walks you through them. If you attend class and use the lecture power points posted online, you hardly need the textbook. She does have a thick Russian accent, but I did not find it to be a problem. 
                
                   Super easy class. Her accent didn't bother me at all. Do well on the homework and first two exams because the final is more difficult. She gives out worksheets in class and if you study those and memorize the formulas it's an easy A. Some questions come out of nowhere but if you think about it you should be able to pick the right answer.
                
                   She has a very thick accent which is difficult to understand. She has slides which are definitely useful but I don't feel like I learned much in her class. It's a do able class if you put forth the effort but definitely not an easy one. 
                
                   Like everyone else said, her accent is extremely hard to get used to, but you will get used to it. I highly recommend her to all because of her grading system, she assigns 10 weekly homework assignments and totals them up for a test grade, so it's an easy A for you. The tests are extremely difficult though, and the final is impossible.
                
                   Grading is really straight-forward and if you study hard, you'll make a good grade for sure. Do the homework on time and study the review sheets she gives you before exams! The textbook is also helpful for clarifying things that you don't completely understand in class. 
                
                   Her tests are difficult because there are only 25 questions. On one of our tests she had to give a 12 point curve because everyone did so bad, and I still made a 52. I went to the TAs office hours and he said that when he tried to take the test on his own he made an 82. He didn't even know where half of the questions had come from. 
                
                   Her accent took a whole day to get used to.  Really was not problem at all.  I'm not sure why she's rated so poorly on here...  As long as you go to class, do your homework, and study a couple hours for her tests you should do fine. I never opened the book or went to 4.0 and made A's on all of her tests.  Definitely would take again. 
                
                   You will freak out over her accent at first, but give yourself a week to get used to it and you'll be fine. She has review questions at the beginning of each lecture and makes great worksheets that make understanding the material easier. Tests are tough, but I paid for 4.0 and Go for this class and have a high A. Homework is every week but it short
                
                   Thoroughly awful professor. Her tests are pulled out of God knows where. They sure aren't from the homework or her lectures. Avoid this professor at all costs. 100's on every homework and less than 50's on the tests...
                
                   Show up to class, pay attention. take notes, and do hw and you will do good on the tests and the class overall. Her test are based of her lectures so I would recommend you to attend the class. I  found it easy to understand her Russian accent but if you have trouble with accents maybe consider a different professor. I felt the class was an easy A.
                
                   He is very nice. Most of the studying you have to do on your own. I loved this professor because he did not 'spoon feed' anyone. You had to study for all of the exams and thanks to him I learned how to study smart and be a better test taker. If you want to be babied then take another professor, but if you want to be challenged take him.
                
                   Worst prof ever, does not teach hardly any material in class and gives no homework nor practices, reviews, etc. Went into the tests not knowing what to expect and god knows where he got his questions from. Ended up having to q-drop, worst class I've ever taken
                
                   I took him for macro and ended  up having to Q-drop. I am good at economics, it makes sense to be but all he did was confuse me. He never actually taught, just talked about current events. I tried to just teach myself from the book but it's just not possible. Take ANY other prof!!!! Also, there are no week in reviews or help sessions or anything 
                
                   WORST PROFESSOR I'VE EVER HAD. Doesn't teach anything in his lectures and his tests are random questions from the textbook. Barely got a C in here because I had to teach myself Microeconomics. 
                
                   Proctor is a nice guy, but this class fell apart. Be ready to read the book and take notes yourself, because lectures were not helpful.  There were four tests and he dropped the lowest one. I sat at the front of the class all year and he remembered me, which I think helped my grade. He also gave extra credit on the last two tests. 
                
                   Don't take his class. He doesn't teach about the topics on the syllabus. He just talks about his personal life. His tests don't match his lecture. In fact, you can ask and he doesn't know what's on his tests. The chapters in the syllabus don't match the ones he teaches. He has no idea what he's teaching, if he teaches at all.
                
                   If you are comfortable memorizing the ENTIRE textbook, go ahead and take this professor. Proctor's lectures are virtually nonexistent and if you want clarification on any of the topics you must attend his office hours. Your grade is the average of your best 3 exam grades (all exams are based off of the textbook not his lectures).
                
                   DO NOT TAKE THIS PROFESSOR! His lectures go all over the place. When asked for help, his only advice is to study harder and read more but this does not work. You will be more productive skipping his class and reading the book because his class is honestly a joke. There are reasons his class is the last to fill up.
                
                   Do not take this class. Mr. Proctor will confuse you completely on the material and you will end up teaching yourself from the book. Worst class I have taken. 
                
                   He states from the beginning of the semester that he will not cover any material from the book in class, doesn't work out any of the problems. And with the few students that are there, he gets off topic... DO NOT TAKE THIS PROFESSOR!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
                
                   DO NOT TAKE THIS PROFESSOR. His lectures in class are all over the place and do not relate to the book in any way. He does not offer any advice to students other than to study harder and speaking from personal experience, does not make much of a difference. Attendance will not make a difference. He does nothing in class except waste your time.
                
                   Mr. Proctor tries to be spontaneous and loud in an attempt to engage the few students who do attend his lectures. Most students do not attend class, simply because it will not help whatsoever on the exams. It's really a surprise each time as to what he will cover on the tests. Make sure you know the chapters inside and out. 
                
                   Topics covered in class weren't on exam. Exams supposedly came straight from book. A few short-answer questions on tests, but mostly multiple choice. Didn't explain or demonstrate how to work problems. I found him very confusing and that he didn't cover the important topics in class. He doesn't use powerpoints and gets off topic a lot.
                
                   Great prof. Understands and teaches the material very well. Tests are challenging but not overwhelming. Help outside of class is almost always available. If you attend class everyday there is no need to open a textbook because everything you need for his tests he explains in class.
                
                   Very Easy! Posts powerpoints on website and gives you a mock exam that is very similar to real exam. HIGHLY RECOMENDED!
                
                   Very fair.  Used a lot of powerpoint, but also had good discussion in class.  Participation/attendance is mandatory - Counts as part of your grade.  Projects, writings, etc. are graded using rubric that is not complicated.
                
                   Gender and Race, explains everything so you can understand it. She is not forgiving. My writing is not the greatest though. When I really tried at my absolute hardest, I got accused of cheating and was told to re-write it. TIPS: go to class, take notes, and do not use ANY electronics or she will shun you for the rest of the semester.
                
                   Prof.Ureta is extremely fair.  You always know where you stand in here class because her 3 exams are curved to average 75 and you are expected to improve your grade with homework scores. No final curve.  If you miss 3 or less classes you get 2 points added to your final grade.  She knows her stuff and uses alot of current examples in her class.
                
                   Ureta - is a good teacher. However, she can tends to move rather quickly. She doesn't seem very approachable, and when you ask questions, she still fails to clarify the answer.  I would take her for undergraduate econometrics, but not graduate.
                
                   Dr. Varghese is my favorite professor. He is one of the few professors who shows how much he cares about his students. His class is not super easy, but it is always really interesting. He gives reviews, and don't be like me and wait until the final to study them. I'm already signed up to take him again.
                
                   He seems like a nice guy but his lectures get confusing at time. He jumps around from subject to subject without any transitions so pay attention. He does reading quizzes almost every class so you have to be prepared. Luckily the reading usually isn't long. Test are sometimes challenging as he writes a lot of trick questions. Do the study guides!
                
                   Has daily quizzes that aren't hard but require you to show up to class.  He is very open to helping students and is involved in a number of student activities on campus. He is rather strict on coming to lecture on time and not leaving. No textbook use at all which is nice, but you must come to class and actively participate to understand. 
                
                   He's a good guy I suppose, but he does not explain things clearly at all - I had to teach myself quite often. Some of the stuff he talked about in class did not make any sense to me - I guess it's because he's a professor, so things that seem easy to him are confusing to the students. Overall, if you work for it, you'd get an A.
                
                   Professor Varghese knows his subject well. He speaks in a very monotone voice. He tries to make jokes, but they kinda fall flat. He seems like a great guy and will help you if you approach him individually. He doesn't explain everything very clearly. Go to class and study the online religious. Everything you need to know will come from online.
                
                   He's a nice guy, but he made a boring subject unbearable to sit through. He couldn't convey things clearly at all. Many of the questions on quizzes and exams are trick questions that could be multiple answers. Again, another example of him not being clear. Other than that, he's not terrible, but I would look at other professors first.
                
                   Super nice guy, not a very good prof. He's not very good at explaining new concepts to people that have never had any prior experience with Economics. After the first couple tests I stopped going to class and just taught myself. It was much easier
                
                   I had him as an undergrad student when he taught at Saint Louis University a few years ago.  He was a very good and clear teacher.  He was the last teacher that I had in my econ concentration and it was a nice end.  Project was pretty straightforward and there was no final which was nice too.  I also remember him being very nice and caring too.
                
                   I loved Dr. Wang, she was adorable! Probably one of my favorite profs ever. She would stay after class with me for hours until I understood the material and offered for her to help me before the tests. I got a C but it is because I missed a lot of classes due to softball games, a B is pretty easy to pull off though. I would DEF choose her again!!!!
                
                   Awesome! Really young but HOT! Pretty easy if you show up and read your book. He is very smart and not out to fail anyone! recommend!
                
                   He is really young, but def. knows his stuff its kinda freaky, go to class and READ YOUR BOOK!!! You will get an A. Highly recommend! Plus he is pretty cute.
                
                   She doesnt teach well at all. Grades were all very low!! Dont take her!!!
                
                   DO NOT TAKE THIS PROF!!! I learned NOTHING in this class! You basically teach yourself from the book but her tests are way more in-depth than what she teaches or what the book explains. I spent hours studying and went to every class and ended up with a D. I made a B in engineering cal 3. Seriously ridiculous. Save yourself and take someone else.
                
                   She is a young Chinese teacher looking to earn her PhD. She is very considerate and tries hard to communicate the ideas through simplified graphs and pictures, but sometimes she's just difficult to understand due to her accent. Tests are very easy, but the online quizzes are time consuming.
                
                   This class was fairly easy. I went to about every other class (even though you don't have to go at all). All his lectures are posted online. I bought the textbook which really helped explain a few confusing concepts. There is no final! Yay! If you're looking for an exciting class, this isn't the place, but if you're looking for an easy grade it is.
                
                   I would not recommend this professor. Grades in this class consist of 3 tests and 5 homework assignments. Lectures are slide-based, but I'll warn you, he has a thick accent, you're better off just reading. His tests are very, very difficult as is the homework. He does curve though, I should have gotten a low B, but I got an A because of the curve.
                
                   Quizzes are free hundreds - participation grade only and they made great studying material! Went to every class, took notes when I wasn't surfing around on my laptop and just made sure to study those quizzes and the powerpoints at home, she's difficult to understand but this class really isn't too bad. Barely made it out with an A.
                
                   3 multiple choice exams, and 3 opportunities for extra credit.  Dr. Ballard holds a weekly live lecture, and if you can understand the lecture there is a lot of knowledge to learn.  I spoke to him on the phone once, and the interaction was pleasant, however, his recorded lectures are problem/theory based, and the exams are concept and multi choice.
                
                   Horrible professor. Couldn't understand him during lectures at all. Sounded like he was mumbling or falling asleep. His lectures are all about the math aspect of eco, however tests are all concept based, and are extremely tricky.  Worded completely different from book. Everyone in my class was worried. 
                
                   Lectures are terrible. Prof should pre-record them for each chapter and then have class live to work problems. Should also have printable solutions to problems to make up for poor handwriting and for people that self teach (me). Worst textbook I've ever seen: poor example problems and Index is limited so test questions are impossible to look up.
                
                   3 classes and extra credit opportunities.  Not all that difficult, but the class live sessions were horrible!!  He is a good guy and even gives his cell number for any questions, but it's 2 hours twice a week of nearly unintelligible lecturing.  It is nearly impossible to understand what he's saying.  If you have a mathcalculus background you'll breeze through.
                
                   Well, online lectures were torture, all they consisted of was working problems yet tests were all multiple choice concept questions.  Seems like a nice man but would never take again
                
                   Economics is not easy; Dr. Ballard made it manageable. He moves slowly through the online sessions to ensure deeper understanding. He encourages questions and gives students his cell number to call and ask questions. The course is only three exams and extra credit. He does give a review prior to each exam.
                
                   Just bad. The course content is not too difficult, but the presentation is seriously lacking. Exam questions are vague and unclear. Lectures are long and slow. Professor is inaccessible through email. I would not recommend.
                
                   Hated the class. couldn't understand a single word he said. stay away.
                
                   He's a nice and helpful, and the class wasn't too hard.  But it's hard to take a professor seriously when the class is disorganized with an outdated syllabus.  I had an issue with an exam question I thought was marked wrong, and he never responded to my email about it.  A huge turn off.  What's worse is he and his GA have such poor grammar.
                
                   Not an easy course if you do not have a minimum of math and statistic background. Dr. Ballard was very helpful however it is difficult to understand what he says. Read the book thoroughly and do the extra credits if you want to get an A.
                
                   Dr. Ballard makes economics tolerable.  He is laid back, will always take your phone call for questions but does appreciate lecture attendance.  He provides enough extra credit to bump up 1 letter grade.  Economics is not the easiest class for me, I made an A and would definitely take him again.
                
                   He is very nice, although he's probably one of the worst teachers I've ever had.  He doesn't explain things very well.  The online class meets twice a week and I just feel like I don't get anything out of it.  I would not recommend him to anyone.
                
                   Took the 4 week online summer session.  Dr. Ballard is very kind and does take an interest in his students.  However, the course seemed so disorganized that it was more difficult than it should have been.  He is very available, but seemed to overcomplicate the format of the class.  I would not take him online again.
                
                   He does not give you the curve if you do not do the "extra credit " work. Do the extra credit work "or else".  Attendance is not mandatory, but he holds absence against you when you miss. So I am told if you are dual track (5-year MBA) his demeanor toward you is MUCH better.
                
                   Dr. Ballard is an extremely helpful professor and is always willing to help.  He is one of the kindest people I have ever met and he truly cares about his students.  I would highly recommend his class!
                
                   Great professor. Took the online class. Attend the live classes, do the required problems and you will be fine. He is always easy to reach and responses fast. Tests are tuff, but he does adjust the curve! I would take him anytime again!
                
                   Course is somewhat difficult, but not overwhelming.  Fairly generous extra credit is offered. The online section offers a weekly lecture.  Dr. Ballard is very nice, but explanations/instructions are at times hard to follow and, on certain occasions, contradictory to those given previously.
                
                   took this professor for Managerial Economics.  not too much work but the exams are not easy.  You will need to study to pass the exam and watch the lectures.  If you are looking for a class with very few assignments but two difficult exams - this is it.  I recommend you do the extra credit.
                
                   Nice man, easy class, but I wouldn't recommend. Dr. Ballard forgets what chapter the lecture is on half the time, does not communicate well by e-mail, can't use technology. He'll assign problems, but won't give you the solutions. When you ask him about it, he'll forget what problems he gave you. Take Swift if you want to learn economics.
                
                   Really nice person.  He is a good teacher, however the material does seem a bit heavy so it would really take sometime to  understand what he is teaching, reading the book is the key in this class although he does give some real life explanations in class the material was just not my cup of tea.  He gives extra credit and a big curve in the end.
                
                   Tough class, hard to hear the teacher during lectures, but you need to listen to the lectures to know what to read in the textbook. You must read the textbook and self teach to make an A. His a fair grader and will give points to all students for confusing questions on exams, so make sure you use it, nice old guy,extra credit helps too. I made an A
                
                   ECO 562 - Summer.  3 Tests plus some extra credit make up the entire class grade.  Test questions (multiple choice) sometimes were unclear.  Prof does not respond to email, must ask questions by phone.  ClassLive lectures were long and difficult to understand/hear.  Would not recommend.
                
                   Must go through lectures to understand what to read for exam. Do not forget to read chapters. Extra Credit helps for grade. Exam questions are sometimes not clear.
                
                   Dr Ballard is an extremely nice person. He is a very fair grader. If you get an opportunity, take his class. Do the extra credits you will get B. Listen to his lectures about three times. 
                
                   Graduate level microeconomics course, lectures are helpful but reading the text is required and the only way to learn the material.  Professor was patient and eager to teach, if you don't understand derivatives before taking the course then you should drop.
                
                   This proffessor is the best proffessor i have ever know. He is so clear about what he is teaching. If you do what he expects from you, you can easily get an A. Be ready to study weekly but dont worry because you will learn a lot.  Advise:  try to choose vaulable X variables for final reg. model upgrade your homeworks after every feedback take notes
                
                   This class is incredibly difficult. You HAVE to attend the online lectures or you will not pass. That being said, Dr. Holmes gives quite a bit of extra credit (attendance, turning in pieces of project, assignment at end of year) and curves his exams. Even with all the EC, you still have to study a ton. Received a B but worked my butt off for it.
                
                   PRO: wat i really like abt him is he shared real life biz lesson from his 20+ executive career in fortune 500 companies. taught u how to deal w/ executive. CON: he wasn't that serious abt teaching course material. exam confused. did give extra credit. emphasize real life presenting skill. if u r really into real researching skill, don't take him.
                
                   Economic Forecasting is by far the most difficult course I have ever taken.  This statement would include sciences and math courses.  With that said, Professor Holmes does an AMAZING job of breaking down this information and teaching skills you can use as a business major.  There is a big project and you must be ready to give 110% or you will fail.
                
                   He is extremely unclear when he teaches. He provides vague and unhelpful feedback when asked. 
                
                   Provides lots of extra credit opportunity. If you are prepared and participating in class, this professor will make the class a breeze. Easy A for sure!!!
                
                   One of the more difficult subjects I've taken. Long-lectures but worth attending live (and even re-listening to). Very thorough and clear and presented in a way that makes sense and walks you through the work.  Patient and responsive to questions.
                
                   Very challenging course. He did however curve the exam grades.
                
                   This class is extremely hard. The class live sessions are all around 300min long and don't really help. He is not very willing to help. When he does respond to you, his answers are very vague. I have been on the Dean's & President's lists almost every semester since I started and I am in danger of failing this this class. Not from a lack of trying.
                
                   Holmes is fantastic. I took thi course online due to availability issues but still aced it even though I'm not that good with math or economics. He was great! Attend class and you'll do fine!
                
                   Economic Forecasting is a hard class to begin with and the fact that Professor Holmes was able to teach it to where the students comprehand the information is great. He is an excellent professor. The live lectures can be long but worth it in the end. I would definitely recommend taking him.
                
                   When the teacher responded to emails, he gave general/vague answers which did not help at all.  If you did not attend his live online classes, he did not attempt to help you.  My class did not get the option of more than one class a week, even if needed.
                
                   Dr. Holmes is very helpful, thorough, and flexible. If needed always offered extra live sessions to ensure we grasped the concepts. The course itself is difficult, but by attending class, and paying attention Dr. Holmes made it significantly easier.
                
                   Professor offered two weekly interactive lectures which really supported learning the content.  You can pass the class without going to lecture, but it helps.  He reviews whats upcoming on the exams and allows time for questions.  Really enjoyed the course.
                
                   I was dreading this class, turned out not to be to bad. Online attendance is recommended for 3 hours twice a week and very helpful if you can go. Instructor goes over tests prior to exam. You do have to do a time consuming project but if you pay attention it's not difficult. Instructor gave multiple extra credit assignments throughout. Made a B+.
                
                   The material is difficult and it would be best if you have some good math and statistics background when taking the class.  If you have a solid background this class will be a lot of work and is interesting.
                
                   There was no way I could pass this class. He makes 300 minute lectures mandatory. And they don't help in the project and homework. He didn't respond to e-mails in a timely manner. I planned on graduating in summer and now because of this it will be the fall. Not happy! I have been on the Deans list previously so it is not because of lack of trying.
                
                   Toughest online course I've ever had. You are going to have to work hard to do well in this class. Online lectures are mandatory for a reason! Dr. Holmes was very patient and would answer any and all questions. Extended due dates and gave some extra credit. This is a hard course, but probably equally as hard to teach online! You have to be patient!
                
                   Gave a paper outline. Then graded on NUMEROUS things not listed in outline.   Online course, but lecture attendance is mandatory (which doesn't work when you have other on-campus classes at the same time). And, online lectures generally run 3 1/2-5  hours/week (more than any 3 credit hour on campus course).
                
                   He's a good person, but I don't recommend you to take this class with him. He doesn't make the class interesting,  and he's not helpful. If you have to take this course, you may depend on studying with a group.  That's how I passed this class.
                
                   I took ECON 501 in spring 2015. I am glad we had a long semester to cover all the material. Dr. ogunc's lectures are not particularly useful, but they are part of the participation grade, so please attend them. The course was online and based in MEL (MY ECON LAB), which was a good thing, as  study aids are available in MEL. Utilize the study aids!!
                
                   Everything is in the online MyEconLab MEL (homework, study plan, etc).  You get MEL by purchasing the book NEW from the school bookstore ONLY.  Prepare to spend A LOT of time logged onto the MEL.  Most every test question is from the study plan. Take good notes and you'll see the question repeated ver batim.  Get organized and prepare to work HARD.
                
                   It's a very easy class. Tests are all multiple choice and he gives attendence credit if you show up to class.
                
                   Doesn't use notes or power points. He just puts a chart up at the beginning of class and talks. Isn't very clear. Didn't learn anything
                
                   Really knows what he's talking about. If you at least TRY, you'll pass.
                
                   I took him for ECON 2301 for my Business Core and fell in love with the subject. He was able to get me into his ECON 3311 course even though I was only a sophomore, and I loved it even more! He made everything easy to understand. In his 3311 course the quizzes are take home and tests are open note. Notes go along with exams as well. 
                
                   Dr. Hudgins makes this an easy class for senior level, but you will need to read a lot.  Dense textbook and supplementary reading for papers.  A fair number of papers need top be written and for each you will have a partners to comment on.  Worthwhile and interesting class with lots of work but you should get an A with normal effort.
                
                   This is a super easy class! Easy notes to follow and the worksheets are similar to his test. There are also open notes quizzes which are cake! I highly recommend his class. It's an easy A!
                
                   Don't believe him when he says something won't be on the test, it will be. He did that for all 3 of our tests. He sometimes starts saying something and then never gets to the point. You will need the book to clarify what he is saying. He does give A LOT of opportunity for extra credit (be in every class), and he definitely notices where you sit.
                
                   TAKE HIM! He even says show up and I'll pass you. His lectures can be long, but the class is easy and he gives a TON of extra credit.
                
                   Mr Jim Lee is very friendly and funny. In terms of teaching, he knows what he is talking about, but sometimes it feels like he can't get his point across. His lectures are sometimes long, but at least he makes humorous remarks. He will always do his best to help you understand, and help you pass his class, as long as you put some effort in as well.
                
                   Ok Mr.Jim Lee is funny. I took this class for a mini-mester which is really awesome even though it is very intense because of the length of time you have, but he is helpful. I would say to look at your syllabus for instructions for homework and review study guide and make examples and you will be fine.I got an B+
                
                   I went to almost all of the classes and I got an A. The homework is all online and super easy because you get 3 tries. It's really easy to get a good grade. He's funny and he gives good examples
                
                   This professor is really a great guy. He judges the student based on where they sit so sit near the front. His tests are fair as long as you do the review. Speak up and get bonus points. He really understands that not everybody loves Econ. He's awesome.
                
                   He has a good website and powerpoint. If you are good at self-study and review, his test is kind of easy. However, he could not make any point clear enough in speech. The more you try to understand him, the more confused you will be. That's very frustrating. And he has all lame jokes.
                
                   Sit close so you can hear and understand him and he is hilarious. If you can't get at least a B, then I hope your major is underwater basket weaving because the bonus points and review sheets make it almost impossible to get lower. Prof Lee knows his stuff and is a very good teacher who understands that not everyone loves economics.
                
                   Fairly simple. Attendance is not mandatory, but is helpful because he gives bonus points to those who are in class and respond to his lectures. He's very halpful and really is sincere when he says he wants everyone to pass. The JA program is also the easiest and the most fulfilling program I've ever done (100 HW grade for sure!)
                
                   Lee is funny and easy. reviews for the tests and Myeconlab online is super easy.
                
                   he is a very good teacher! hard to understand at first....but you get used to it! he is funny and enthusiastic ...i would def. recommend taking him
                
                   Really funny professor and very knowledgable!  He is fairly hard on some course work but nothing beyond average.  I would recommend taking him.
                
                   Easy class!  You take 3 tests and the lowest one is dropped.  He gives bonus points all the time.  As long as you pay good attention in class you'll be good.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   He is a funny teacher, but sometimes unclear.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   He keeps his powerpoints online and that's the only thing he goes over in class. Attendence is not required, however if you show up he gives bonus quizes every day and they are 2 extra points on your exam for each one. This class is a breeze.
                
                   You can not understand what he is saying . . . He does not have very good english . . . you can only understand him when he is telling his jokes (he slows down so you can undertand them)
                
                   No Comments
                
                   No Comments
                
                   I took this class online over the summer and it's an easy A! There are no test, only group discussions and quizzes! You can get an easy 20 out of 20 on discussions as long as you comment 4 days out of the week! She gives tons of extra credit! There is no reason you should not get an A!
                
                   One of the most disappointing classes I've ever took. Her lecture was boring and not useful and she gave really bad really life examples. She gives you stuffs like you only have this one class for the whole semester. Her graders do most of the job. Tests are essay questions (usually 6 pages). Extra credit are not easy to get! 
                
                   The course is easy, but the benefits of the homework not so good. The tests are confusing, she made mistakes throughtout the semester that it could of been been this answer but it was actually this. Went for help, very rude and uncompassionate. She is cold when you get to talk to her.
                
                   Did not like this class. For every chapter you have to answer the questions at the end of the chapter.  She only grades about 2 out 10 of the questions, so you may not get any points even if you do the homework. The lectors seemed easy but the tests are hard! On a good note, she does offer lots of extra credit opportunities.
                
                   An excellent professor who makes you earn your grade.  Test are essay and make sure you understand the material by applying it to current articles.  Plenty of extra credit which can increase your grade, if needed.
                
                   She is a good teacher. Very clear, gives study guides, and you can use cheat sheets (but at the cost of 5 points to your test grade). Only problem: BORING.
                
                   All the people complaining about how hard her class was are being quite unreasonable.She provides study guides & that is basically what it's on the exam.As long as you study you will pass. Just like in any other class. I don't know what the people below me expected.This is a pretty easy class. Study guides=passing the exam.It is that simple.Really.
                
                   dO not take her i took her for summer first lessons seems so easy and interesting but her tests r hard
                
                   Do NOT TAKE MARILYN SPENCER!!! UNLESS YOU WANT YOUR GPA TO DROP!! VERY difficult.. and she has no COMPASSION NOR SYMPATHY FOR YOUR HARD WORK!!!
                
                   Had her for a class in 1983 at Butler University. Certainly a hottie then!
                
                   I didn't want to take this class, but all of her lectures are online, she also gives PLENTY of opportunities for extra credit. If you show up for class and go over the notes you should do great, she wants you to succeed, and at halloween she's a hoot!
                
                   She was a really nice lady but her class sucked! Her lectures were really boring and she treated everyone like they were economic majors.
                
                   STAY AWAY FROM HER AND THIS CLASS!!! AHHHH
                
                   boring class, lectures also put you to sleep, still its usefull
                
                   She is difficult, if learning about the economy is really not your thing. Testing is easy because she gives you choices on what you can use DURING the test, but there is always a catch. She'll add 2pts. if you don't use anything, take 5 points off if you use a note card and will take 15 pts off if you use your notes and textbook. Not to mention that she adds 3 extra credit questions at the end worth 4pts each. So she's okay, but economics is not my thing so it doesn't keep my interest that much.
                
                   She's a very nice lady and makes class as interesting as economics can get.  I'm not an econ genius but I understand the class.
                
                   I had her in Spring '05, she is pretty difficult but if you pay attention in class then you should have no problem on the tests! She is too tough on detail! I accidentaly put the wrong course number on a paper and she took off 10 points!
                
                   No Comments
                
                   BEWARE OF THIS ONE.....
                
                   She plays favorites. So if you are a working mom with three kids she'll love you. She doesn't seem to notice when people cheat on tests, so just sit in the back and you'll be fine. If you actually want to learn something, avoid this class...
                
                   Best prof you will ever have! No more needs to be said!
                
                   loved his class
                
                   Take his class. do it.  Life will be that much better
                
                   One of the best teachers at TAMUG, not only does he make you want to come to class you learn more than just the class material when he talks, be sure to take Boudreaux sometime while at TAMUG, once you get upper level MARA its all full of retards 
                
                   He is a great and helpful professor! You must take notes. Before each exam, he does a review which is extremely helpful. Tests are not long and grading criteria is simple. Must do a paper or will fail. Overall, awesome teacher!
                
                   BEST TEACHER EVER!!!!!!!
                
                   Great professor.
                
                   such a good teacher and a nice guy
                
                   I have taken Mr. Boudreaux for many classes at Texas A&M Galveston from Economics to Operations Management. He is a very helpful professor and very knowledgeable in the courses that he teaches. I highly recommend taking Mr. Boudreaux.
                
                   He is one of the best teachers you will ever have. He likes to joke around and is VERY funny. He really knows his stuff. I took his 7 AM and while others skipped days, I did not and he rewarded me for not skipping by giving me an A (when I think I was at a B). Dual Credit students should take him. I know its early but it is so worth it in the end.
                
                   the best Economics teacher at the school or one of the best teachers at the school. The material is easy to understand when you go to his lectures. Use his study guide book at the library and on review days highlight what he says because thats your exam
                
                   I'm so glad Boudreaux is teaching more Mara classes!!! By far THE BEST professor at Tamug. I immediately sign up for courses that he teaches regardless of my schedule. Extraordinary professor. If you listen, you will learn. Go to the reviews, you will pass. He wants nothing but success for his students.
                
                   AWESOME GUY!!!!!
                
                   Class is pretty boring, but if you go and let him get to know you he will give you extra credit if you don't have an A. Questions come from the book and online.
                
                   One of the best teachers I have ever had.
                
                   Great professor.  Occasionally he goes on tangents during lecture but he always gets his point across.
                
                   Great teacher, he is so helpful and so nice and makes class interesting! My favorite teacher at TAMUG for sure!
                
                   Great teacher. His lectures explain the material great. He lets you know prior to the tests what will be on the test. To get a good grade in the class you just have to read the textbook and show up for his lectures. Boudreaux will do everything he can to help you get a good grade.
                
                   He is a really good teacher he uses real world examples and tells you what is on the test everytime.
                
                   Great teacher uses real world examples
                
                   He is one of my favorite professors!  He is extremely nice and very approachable!  He's funny and has the best way of teaching (his notes are the best I've seen).  I learned the moves in his class and enjoyed it!  He's a cutie pie and you can tell that he loves what he does, and taking him for microeconomics is the best choice.
                
                   Attendance is not mandatory, however his test are almost 100% notes.  So if your a person who doesnt go to class and tries to read to makeup the class u missed, you are going to fall behind by A LOT. he is a cell phone nazi so  Be sure they are on silent before you go to class. His grade consist of 3 tests and homework submitted online on myeconlab
                
                   Dr. Yoskowitz is a nice teacher. I learned a lot from him. He is taking notes on the board and explains totally. I enjor attending his class. You will get high score if you attend every class and review what he teaches.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   great teacher... i would recommend him over the others. always tries to explain thoroughly, and helpful if you have questions. gives lots of pop quizzes so helps to go to class and just review the notes from last class. and major plus--hes cute!
                
                   He's very good at relating economics to a student's life and breaking things down.  He's not very book oriented because he has his own notes and does well at contributing a little humor to the class.
                
                   Dr. Yoskowitz helped me out with any questions I had and he was also interested into what the class had to say.  In other words he cared about his students.  He explained everything he taught thouroughly and the exams were always easy. Plus he is not bad to look at so you dont get bored.
                
                   Dr. Ko is a little unorganized at first, but he truly cares about his students and their success. He is very willing to work with students and holds personal study sessions on Sundays. He can be tough to understand, but he truly tries. He reviews before each test which leaves you completely prepared. Overall, he does a good job.
                
                   Teaches Statistics. Just overall a bad teacher. I would NOT recommend taking his class. He wont tell you grades when you need to know whether to do extra credit or not. incredibly heavy use of another professor's ppts. When asked a statistics related question he says to read your book or avoids the question. DONT TAKE THIS CLASS
                
                   The class isn't super hard, but it's harder than my Econ 202 teacher(Niko). Her grading criteria was weird though. She did mess up my grade and gave me a B when I got an A, she fixed it but still...
                
                   Mathur is a super sweet lady, but she has a challenging class. She expects you to be in class and do the homework that is assigned. Her tests are majority short answer with problems to solve and she is a tough grader. She will answer any questions that you have, but can be confusing at times when trying to explain the graphs. 
                
                   If you have her for econ, she is good. If you take her for stat.... then good luck. Had her in both classes and you would think its a completely different teacher. Overall a decent prof, but im giving her a bad review because she is unorganized, grades super hard, has mandatory attendance, and is unclear in her lectures.
                
                   She follows the text book and her class notes to the letter on her tests. As long as you memorize her  class notes and the chapters that the test will be over you should do fine. Also, she is very helpful if you don't understand any thing.
                
                   Terrible professor. Do not take. Gives excessive homework, very rude when talking to students, does not care about you at all. Do not take her.
                
                   Dr. Wiseman cares about her students but the class is terrible. Expect daily homework and MyStatLabs. The homework, CPA's, and lectures do little to prepare you for the test which is my main complaint with the class. I do well on the assignments (hw,CPA's) but the tests are a completely different format then what you prepare for. Not recommended.
                
                   I know there are a lot of negative reviews about her since she tends to assign a lot of homework (expect weekend online homework) and her tests can SOMETIMES be a challenge but really she's a great teacher and she gives students chances to raise their grades and her tests help her students know how much they truly understand the material. Not bad..
                
                   Wiseman teaches a rough class. Not easy. Lectures are long and mandatory. The amount of work done is very extensive. She is a nice person and does care about the students, but I would not recommend taking her for anything. 
                
                   Dr. Wiseman is a tough teacher. She requires homework, attendance, and the amount of work done is very extensive. She does care about the students but is very unorganized. Lectures are long and the online homework never ends. Before every class a CPA (classroom preparation assignment) is due and counted for a grade. The students are not happy.
                
                   good prof. but some of the info given is somewhat hard to follow (formulas). but overall pretty good. and she is HOT (thats why i dont miss her class)!!!
                
                   She's nice.  I got an A in the course when I wasn't really sure I would in the beginning.  She's very good about homework and it's 20% of your grade to do it.  If you do it, you get full credit.  Tests are from homework.  HIGHLY RECOMMEND!
                
                   Professor Harmeet is an excellent instructor. As long as you read the power-point slides you'll be fine. make sure you show up to class and keep up with the assignmentsquizzes. He drops 4 quizzes and 1 assignment which helps your grade a lot. We need more professors like him.   
                
                   As long as you show up and do the online work, you will do fine. Excellent teacher. 
                
                   Hes the only professor in the school that teaches micro. hes hard, pray b4 each test
                
                   Very Helpful, answered all questions before moving to next topic.
                
                   Easy class! HIGHLY RECOMMEND! Understanding when comes to late current event logs, occasionally drops grades, study reviews, powerpoints available on Blackboard, piece of cake homework. He uses real-life examples, and grades homework according to effort, not accuracy. Definitely a great teacher, easy and teaches good.
                
                   I love his examples.  You have to pay attention to appreciate his humor.  Class is easy to pass and easy to get an A in.  Gives a curve and partial credit.  Homework is automatic full credit just for turning it in.
                
                   If you cannot get an A in this guy you probably rode the short bus to school.  Reviews, covers the subject, and homeworks that boost your grade.  Just do your stuff, easy A.
                
                   Do the homework. You get credit just for doing them. Test are simple since he gives you a review for each test. Finals is not comprehensive. Attend class is you want to know what's going on because sometimes he doesn't email the ppt.
                
                   Cool guy, realizes the stuff can be boring. Easy grading.
                
                   Read the text and use the online supplements. Lectures largely based on real-world application, requires a knowledge of the concepts beforehand, so read the book before class. Professor has credible real-world experience he brings that helps the book's jargon make more sense. Read the book, pay attention, that's pretty much it.
                
                   First year teacher. Really improved his teaching skills. If you wont apply yourself, you will be confused, struggle, and fail. Economics is hard enough. He will go beyond and above to help if you talk with him. All in all, if you are a hard worker his course will be easy. If you are lazy, dont bother.
                
                   There is no doubt Dr. Harun knows what he is talking about but unfortunately the class is boring and the book is useless. The group project is very time consuming & I don't feel that it is necessary at this level. It is nice that he provides a study guide. The study guides are way too long and broad. This class is a requirement not an option.
                
                   Dr. Harun is easy to approach. Attend all the classes because he makes them interesting and you learn a great deal from the discussions. Just keep up with your journal entries and read the materials provided and you should do well.
                
                   That was the first Finance class I have ever taken. It was a lot of work but Dr. Huran made himself available. The biggest stressor and time consumer is the project. I will take more classes with him. He made Finance interesting.
                
                   That was the first Finance class I have ever taken. It was a lot of work but Dr. Huran made himself available. I would take him. He helps prepare you. The biggest stressor is the project, but once your done. Your are fine.
                
                   much better prof than my undergrad.  Very helpful
                
                   Much better instructor than my undergrad one.  Very helpful.
                
                   Dr Harun does have a clear accent on certain words, but you can figure out what he is saying pretty quickly.  Exams are tough, you can't sleep through this class.  Missed an A by 1 point and it was too bad, too sad.
                
                   I'm surprized to see that a prof like this is even allowed to teach at Grad level. He just reads the PP slides. Quizzes had several errors, Grading takes forever, Exams are: 50% MC & 50% essay Qs (which are graded hard).  No application of material is taught in class. How he has a job is beyond me.  TAMUSA needs better prof teaching at this level.
                
                   Excellent professor! Learned a great deal! Do your homework, come to class, study, and you'll do fine!!! A+
                
                   
                
                   Do not take this class!! Horrible teacher whose test are ridiculous. He gives a ton of information and then the tests are application based, but if you don't understand it in the first place how do you apply it. I don't understand how a professor with such bad reviews has managed to keep his job. TAMUCT needs to offer more online professors.
                
                   The workload is ridiculous, he is rude when responding to students, he is unhelpful, and his materials are terribly unorganized. Plus, TAMU-CT doesn't offer any other profs teaching this course, so you're stuck with him!
                
                   Tests were incredibly difficult and not always straight from the textbook. Tons of extra material is provided and you have to understand this material inside-out to do well on tests. Aplia didn't really help on tests. Fortunately, there's a lot of extra credit that can bump you up a letter grade if you do it. Learn the financial ratios!!!
                
                   Worst professor ever! His tests are made up by him and hard as you know what! 
                
                   Take this course in class! No matter how many times I read the chapters, I barely passed the exams. Every chapter and Aplia quiz drills formulas in your head, and when you get to the test there isn't a single math question.  Dyer can be very condescending when you ask for help, and you're pretty much on your own. Hardest I've ever worked for a D.
                
                   Had to take this class as a leveling class for my MBA. Prof. Dyer seemed extremely confused and scatterbrained. The Blackboard page was a big mess with information scattered everywhere. He had to make multiple changes to the syllabus and grading because he could not figure out how to reset grades etc.
                
                   Going to class does not help.
                
                   DO NOT TAKE THIS CLASS. Which unfortunately you have to because he is the only finance professor they have. You will learn nothing in class and regardless of studying on your own you will do badly on tests. He should not be allowed to teach. the textbook does not help and neither do his copious amounts of useless handouts.
                
                   He is a very confusing teacher and doesn't teach from the book. You are not required to attend class and our quizzes and test were online except for the final. You have to remind him of things because he does forget. Other than that you can easily pass his classes as long as you do the assignments.
                
                   Prof Dyer is a terrible teacher and very dishonest. He doesn't allow students to see their grade for the final because he manipulates the grades. I received higher scores on every exam and assignment than another student in the class and I received a lower grade than that student. The other student was always kissing up to him and somehow got an A.
                
                   Who hands out an extra credit assignment and doesn't even let the class know that it's timed and it must be turned in at the end of class, instead sits at his computer in silence while the whole class wonders why the teacher isnt going over anything. Dyer does, why because he lacks simple communication skills. He sucks
                
                   Don't do it! If you have other options than take that path. The entire class had trouble with understanding his instructions. I never felt so belittled on an exam. You have been warned!!!
                
                   His test are all hard, he gives you a handful of handouts to study from for the exams. Whenever we went over the exams his own answers on the scantron were wrong. I think the only reason he gives the exception of making a 70 or higher on the aplia assignments to receive a C in the class, is so he won't have to answer to why his whole class failed.
                
                   Please stay away from this class, you will not learn anything from this guy. It is true that if you make a 70 or higher on aplia you were guaranteed a C in the course, but I don't know how long that option will be available in his class. I literally think they found this guy at a Star Wars convention, he is a little off. Trust me stay away
                
                   The only good thing about this class is if you get at least an C on all of your quizzes on apila, then you get an C in the class.But if you want an B or A then you have to get good grades on the exams. On our first exam no one got higher than a 60%.The multiple choice is way to hard and confusing!He also tends to loose people and go off topic.
                
                   Dr. Dyer's style of teaching was  horrible and the whole class never knew what he was talking about. When someone would ask for clarification, he acted like you were stupid. His attitude was always bad.  This is the first professor I've ever had trouble with.
                
                   Very challenging course. Dr. Dyer made the class manageable and was willing to work with his students.
                
                   He's AMAZING! His class isn't a blow off class, but he definitely explains and teaches it so that you understand it extremely well. He's really sweet and you can tell he's happy to be there. I loved coming to this class!
                
                   As long as you show up for class and take detailed notes, you can get an A in this class. If you are happy with your grade based on the first three tests you don't have to take the final! Would take this course again, it was very interesting and Prof Edwardson is hilarious
                
                   Best ECON professor I had in undergrad. Wonderful class that balanced difficulty with content Making an A is attainable for anybody who puts in effort.
                
                   Best professor at a&m. Great guy, and hilarious. TAKE DR. EDWARDSON
                
                   Favorite professor at A&M
                
                   Extremely good professor. No required homework but does give optional homework for practice. He lectures really well and make the information easy to understand. Only had 3 exams and the final replaces one of the exam grades.
                
                   I liked him! He was interested in econ and serious about getting his material across to his students. There were some really difficult parts, but generally if you do your part (attend lecture and study hard) then you will do well. He is open to clarifying things during or after class, and can break down difficult concepts with tangible examples.
                
                   Dr. Edwardson is a great lecturer! He is truly willing to help his students and clearly lets his students know what is going to be on the test. It is evident that he cares for his students and he is a super sweet and funny guy. If you are taking ECON 202, he is the only choice. Best prof I've had. If you study the notes, you should get an A.
                
                   Moves very fast in lectures so if you miss something its gone. 
                
                   Took Professor Edwardson about two years ago and he still to this day is one of my favorite professors! He is so easy to talk to and is always willing to help. He told a joke about ground coffee and it is now one of my favorites to tell friends. Will give you easy real life examples. TAKE THIS PROFESSOR!!!!!
                
                   Edwardson is a funny teacher who does a good job teaching the stuff. His explanations in class are clear. Some of the test questions are vague, but he is one of best Econ professors you can get. He has an optional final that replaces your lowest test grade.
                
                   he's the only reason i passed econ. he puts everything into terms that are easily understandable and relatable, giving lots of real world examples to help you understand the concept. tests basically follow his notes from class so you need to go. haven't opened my textbook once and have an A. final is optional and can replace your lowest test grade.
                
                   Took Professor Edwardson for ECON202 and loved him! All the material on tests come right from the book and his lectures basically recap that! He will work with you on anything you need help with; he cracks jokes too; 3 tests, no homework, no quizzes and he curves for sure. If you like the 3 exam grades, you dont have to take final - he's awesome!
                
                   Dr. Edwardson is an amazing professor. He teaches with clarity and reading the book isn't very useful. Seriously, just study and review his notes a lot. He's test can be tricky but doable. I didn't do so good on my first test but after I started to study just his notes instead of everything, I started doing better. Highly recommended prof. 
                
                   Edwardson is just a cool guy all around. You can tell he loves economics and is always applying economics to modern day examples so that we can understand them. tests are a little tough though
                
                   Professor Edwardson is pretty good at what he does. He made microeconomics interesting and used real world examples to explain concepts more clearly. His only grades consist of 4 tests and your lowest is dropped at the end of the semester. He teaches straight from the book, I stopped attending class and just read the book and made an A.
                
                   Tests are easy if you study. He often goes over the material he will put on the test the class before. Great prof! I would definitely take another class from him.
                
                   Amazing professor, he explains everything really well and he is really funny. He always puts some jokes into his lecture. Exams are quite easy, even if you don't attend class, if you read the book and study, the exams shouldn't be a problem.
                
                   Makes Econ easy
                
                   Awesome professor. He's very helpful and funny. His lectures are kind of boring and the tests are slightly difficult, but as long as you take good notes, read the book and do all of the practice problems he assigns you should do very well.
                
                   Dr. Rahman is a VERY GOOD professor. He does have a bit of an accent but once you get past that its fine. He gives the lectures good energy and he knows his stuff. The tests are not easy and are in class. He grades on a curve at the end but even to get on the good end of the curve you have to participate and STUDY!!! If you slack forget it! 
                
                   I have attended all the classes because Dr. Rahman made them interesting and you learn a great deal from his lectures and the discussions. He is a great teacher. He can easy explain complicated issues. Study the online book and supplemental readings then you should be fine.
                
                   Very hard to understand.  Quizzes were not based on the readings.  The only plus is that he curves.
                
                   He's really nice, but hes very confusing. He is NOT consistent with the quizzes, the supplemental readings and the lectures. He mainly uses the supp. readings & the PPTs. The midterm & final were very hard & confusing because of the grammar. He needs to use test bank questions & not write his own. We rarely used the e-book. Good Luck! He curves.
                
                   Very difficult accent. Grades on a curve that turns out ok.
                
                   He's really confusing because he goes off on tangents but if you read the online book and supplemental readings then you should be fine.  The powerpoints go in order of the supplemental readings so maybe have those supplemental chapters with you during class and you should be fine.  He grades on a curve =)
                
                   cool teacher from bangladash. very friendly and is a great inspiration
                
                   This guy does everything he can to help students!  His curves are huge!  He also grades most tests on a scale of 105 with 35 questions.  I had him over the summer and still got an A.
                
                   Can't understand what he is saying. Tests are hard and he doesn't curve much.  EXTREMELY boring.
                
                   Good class but gives too much homework. If you do the himeworks, you should be ok.
                
                   HE NEEDS TO CURVE HIS TESTS AND GRADES!  HIS LECTURES ARE BORING TO EVERYONE BUT HIM, AND HIS TESTS AND QUIZZES ARE DIFFICULT.  HE REALLY NEEDS TO CURVE!!!!!!
                
                   His tests really suck!
                
                   He is not a good teacher and his tests are super hard then his materials his bonus points for homework helps but I do not recommand this teacher.its hard to pass his class.I did pass with decent grade but I had to teach my self.
                
                   Excellent professor. Practical approach to lectures. Heavy use of concepts from prereq course (BUAD3355). Gives extra credit on exams for doing homework, go to the board and try! Allows &quot;cheat sheet&quot;. Practice reviews and hw and pay attention. And don't miss class! Oh and cheap &quot;textbook&quot;! Only $20, room for notes, and we use it everyday.
                
                   Excellent professor.  Do all your homework and go to the board for points of the exams.  Old test are the same except, he will trick you and come up with a new one to see if you are cheating.  Easy A dont miss class you wont catch up.
                
                   uses his own handouts.  lot of formulas.  but(!!!) he leaves the room when he gives a test.  everybody cheats!
                
                   Awesome professor, hard tests, clear explanations, very lineant and understanding. A++
                
                   you don't even have to go to class, just print the reviews offline and the questions from the test are on it.  Very easy.  He drops your lowest test grade, so if you do well enough you don't have to take the final...i highly recommend him
                
                   Very easy class!!! I recommend to anyone who wants to get a good grade.
                
                   Dr. Wang overall is a great professor. She is very knowledgeable of the subjects she teaches. She's very nice, fair, connects with the students, and is understanding. So far, she's one of my favorite teachers at TAMUG.
                
                   This professor is very unwilling to work with students who have compromising schedules. Miss a few classes? No curve. The online homework is ridiculously difficult and is never discussed in class. The tests are fairly easy but again, the homework doesn't reflect them at all. Take Boudreaux if you can.
                
                   Good professor, but probably better suited teach grad students. She has a tendency to teach beyond "Introductory" concepts. Study, do the homework, and a good grade is possible.
                
                   Nice teacher, has trouble communicating if you go to class and do the homework review you will easily receive an A in the class!
                
                   Easy course, pay attention take notes and go to class. 25 percent of your grade is homework and attendance.
                
                   He has a Greek accent but it is still easy to understand him.
                
                   Niko is a great teacher, very knowledgeable on the subject. However, due to his greek accent, he sometimes is hard to understand. He uses powerpoint and writes examples on the board. Definitely don't miss his review sessions for the tests, they are very important in order to pass the tests. 
                
                   Awesome teacher! He talks fast just pay attention and it is easy. He quizzes you on EVERYTHING that is on the test, review quiz=A+ on the test.
                
                   Best teacher I've had! Go to class, you make an A
                
                   Tough class, but he makes it interesting and easy to understand. Attendance helps a lot.
                
                   This class was the most enjoyable one I had all semester! I personally can care less about economics but Turner makes it interesting and not too difficult. He assigns online asignmens every once in awhile but you can use his lecture notes from blackboard to help. It's not hard at all. Has great study sessions and escellent study guides! RECOMMEND!!
                
                   Dr. Turner is VERY helpful and understanding. Come to class and you will pass. His lectures are definitely interesting. He knows Economics well, but understands that not everyone else enjoys it, so he relates his lectures to things that interest his students. Easy professor, for being Economics :)
                
                   His lecture is very easy and funny! You will feel relax! Test questions appear in practice! Just listen carefully and do the homework, you will make a "A".
                
                   He is my favorite teacher!
                
                   He is my favorite economic teacher. Test question appears in the exercises, easy test. His lecture is funny and clear. He glad to help students.
                
                   Dr. Turner is easily one of my favorite professors. He's extremely helpful. You can tell that he's incredibly passionate about what he teaches and it makes the classroom environment very pleasant. I really enjoyed how he related a lot of the lessons to pop culture and sports. It's a tough subject, but he made it enjoyable. He's a cutie as well.
                
                   Awesome teacher. One of the few good teachers at tamucc. Economics is a hard class but he makes sure everyone understands it.
                
                   TAKE TURNER, DO NOT TAKE SPENCER! Attending his class is key for all tests, quizzes and h/w! He hates low attendance, he'll give out quiz answers or extra credit. He posts all lectures, h/w, solutions and old exams online. He's great, you actually learn!!
                
                   His lectures are key for tests, quizzes and homework. They are easy if you attend class regularly. He doesn't like seeing low class attendance, he'll even reset quiz dates and &quot;give out&quot; answers to the people who showed up. He will post all lectures online along w/ all homework, solutions, old exams. He's a great ECON teacher!! DO NOT TAKE SPENCER!
                
                   Probably the best teacher ever when it comes to giving great examples on very hard material. His lecture notes online help out a lot and help on understanding the topics better. He is very laid back and down to earth. Almost feels like he is a student by the way he teachers and talks. Would defiantly take more of his classes!
                
                   I thought he was a great teacher. Economics can be a little tough but he was great at breaking it down for the class. Before every test and quiz we had a sample posted online. He even offered review sessions before each test. He is a good teacher, and if you have to take this course take it with him.
                
                   Attend all lectures to be able to understand the notes he uploads to Blackboard. Awesome teacher. Very helpful if you approach him, or go see him at his office hours. He holds awesome reviews the night before the exam, usually at 7pm, he will let you know what room, and stays till there are no more questions. Reviews are just like his Exams.
                
                   One of the best professors I've ever had. He's truly passionate about his classes, his joy for his work draws you in and makes his lectures interesting. I mean, really, it's Econ, so it's pretty boring. He adds fun stories to keep you interested and relates it to you perfectly. Plus he puts everything on Blackboard! Take him!!! You won't regret it!
                
                   Hes pretty dec.
                
                   Basically the best professer ever!
                
                   I loved Dr. G! If you are having any problems understanding the material, she will go out of her way to help you out. Micro-econ is a pretty boring/hard subject in general, but she makes it a point to add some "fun" to her lectures. Although you deff have to work for your grade (same w/ all micro classes!)I  would recommend her  to other students. 
                
                   I took Dr. Gevrek for Maymester microeconomics and she is great! I would recommend her to anyone who needs to take micro. Classes are long but manageable. Does have a slight accent but she is not hard to understand at all! Explains things really well and makes sure everyone understands before moving on!  
                
                   Great professor who understands economics is tough! She will help you but you need to make the effort. Lectures are fantastic! Quizzes every week, 3 exams, and 1 writing assignment.
                
                   Dr. Gevrek is by far the most inspiring professor of my time in college spent thus far. Before taking her class I was uncomfortable with economics till she taught it in such a fun and clear way. Today Econ is my major and passion all thanks to Dr. Gevrek
                
                   She is amazing! Super helpful with everything. She wants you to learn, and is willing to do whatever it takes to help. She offers opportunities to earn extra credit, although I didn't need it at all. I never once used the textbook because her tests come from her notes and the quizzes that she posts online. I highly recommend her.
                
                   Dr. Gevrek is a sweet woman and very helpful. Had her for Microecon Principles, and she is very helpful. She's from Turkey and has a bit of an accent, but it's no big deal. She has a million examples for every topic and won't quit until everyone knows what she's talking about. Great class.
                
                   I got her Microeconomics lecture. She was perfect ! I'm glad to take her class. She is helpful all the time. Her notes are easy to understand,she explains the issues with excellent examples. At the end her exams are not difficult and are related what she explained in the class. I definitely recommend her.
                
                   She takes attendance everyday. Keep teaching and writing her notes in the whole class time. You have quizes (8-12 questions) every week which are the only chance for you to practice her lectures. However, her exams are hard and long with unpredictable questions.
                
                   This professor is very lecture/ notes driven and relies on them quite often. Practically copies what her notes says to the white board. Her examples may be difficult to understand at first due to her Turkish nature I suppose. However, all in all go to office hours for extra clarity and is easy to the eye needless to say.
                
                   Class is not overly difficult. She gives timed weekly online quizzes, there are 11 total but she will pick the best 8 to count towards your grade. Read the chapters beforehand so you  know what she is talking about, otherwise you will be lost. There are 3 tests total, including the final. Lastly, there is a small writing assignment.
                
                   Great Professor. I had many classes with him and would take more if it was possible.
                
                   Very interesting class. He is very knowledgeable. If you enjoy economics, you will find him the best professor!
                
                   Great professor! His tests aren't easy but if you study, you will do fine!
                
                   I took his economics class (I generally love economics), I definitely did learn from him, but the online homework was so hard for me, the tests were also hard. 
                
                   I loved Crowley because he talks about real life economics a lot. You can tell he knows what he's doing, but in terms of teaching it I could barely understand the 2nd half of the class. Only two tests, no final. Spot quizzes are guaranteed after a screen cast so you better be there. 
                
                   I went to his office for questions and he was helpful, he's funny, and easy going but he makes you work for your grade. He has high expectations and expects you to meet them.
                
                   Awesome professor! Completely recommend taking him! His lectures are only based off powerpoints and he has random spot quizes.
                
                   Worst professor I have ever taken in my college career. He knows what the material is about he is terrible at explaining it to those who has no idea what it is. Don't think about asking a question because he will make you feel stupid. I spent more time trying to teach myself and wondering how I was going to pass his hard test. Class cancelled a lot
                
                   He is very intelligent, but isn't helpful. He doesn't clearly answer questions and he makes you feel stupid for asking them. I didn't learn anything, but I made good grades. He was out of the country for a few weeks and canceled class at least twice a month. I had to teach myself a lot. Wouldn't recommend.
                
                   useless teacher, accent is annoying. only reads out of the power point. DO NOT EVER ask for help. Crowley makes you feel stupid. exams are worthless. could not learn anything about economics.
                
                   Awful professor. could care less about his students and his tests BS. Not to mention my semester he missed class more than we are allowed as students and ALWAYS took attendance one way or another when he didnt cancel class last minute or send a TA. DO NOT TAKE HIM
                
                   his lectures are awful, he just reads from the powerpoint, do not ask for help, or it will be a 30 minute discussion of why you should listen better
                
                   Don't ask for help, it will be humiliating and degrading. I overheard other students mention similar problems with him that I had, so obviously I was not a fluke. Attendance [Spot quizzes], extra credit, and labs are a MUST. Test are difficult, labs are simple just time consuming. Don't recommend him overall.
                
                   He only reads the powerpoint.He is worry only to cover all the material (up to 2 chapters for class). I don't recommend this professor. You can learn the same by your self reading the book
                
                   Great teacher. Strongly recommend going to class and keeping up with assignments. He does do RANDOM spot quizes that will effect your grade if you miss them, but he doesnt take attendance except for the quizes.
                
                   He is very intelligent, but he just comes into class and reads off the powerpoint slides.  I stopped coming to class because he doesn't really teach you anything you can't get from the slides.  Disappointing.
                
                   He's awsome. If you really want know about what going on around the world in the economic view. I highly recommend him. His class is my favor. He's great
                
                   He's a nice guy, but the class is hard! The tests were very difficult. I honestly can't recommend Crowley. Jim Lee would probably be a better professor, since I've heard that his class is very easy.
                
                   The accent makes it easier to listen to him.  Very accomplished person, so he knows his stuff.  Not that many assignments.  Have to attend class because he gives pop quizzes almost everytime.
                
                   hes really nice and for the most part pretty easy!
                
                   He's a really good professor. Cares for his students and is also very understanding towards the students. Its hard to fail his class. He give in class assignments but they are pretty easy and he reviews them after. He allows a sheet of notes for the test. 
                
                   Really simple, but helpful class. There is no way you will not pass, unless you absolutely don't try on anything. Show up for class, you never know when he'll give an in-class assignment. He allows 1 sheet of notes, front and back, for test... make sure to put review questions on there because they are either the same or similar to the test. 
                
                   Economics  is a tough subject in general. However this professor explains everything in good detail that you will remember. He does give pop quizzes in class, but they are done in a group. 10 mins before class is over he goes over the answers. When its time for the exams u are allowed to bring 1 cheat sheet. Don't double think about it, take him! 
                
                   Really cool professor. Gives you the test for the review and lets you bring any notes you want in for the test. He comes to class, says what he wants to say, and its time to go. He gives in class assignments that are participation grades. And you will be required to participate in Junior Achievement. Great experience!
                
                   Easiest class I've taken so far. You're better off taking Microeconomics first and then this class. You will more than likely have the Junior Achievement program pushed on you, but do not worry because this professor throws out more than enough extra credit to not have to do it.  
                
                   Had many online assignments but can find on quizlet or google. Also had in class assignments each week that counts. He drops the lowest grade. Takes the highest midterm. Posts all notesreviewsslideshows all online. Basically if you know how to access the notes and show up once a week, easy A. 
                
                   Good professor who cares about his students. If you need help just ask and he will be more than happy to help you understand the topic. He understands that Economics is difficult for some students. He puts the powerpoint presentations online which helps if you need to go back and review.
                
                   nicest professor you could possibly take. has a slight accent but is so nice to his students. he drops your  lowest exam grade which just shows how much he actually cares for his students. actually posts his lecture powerpoints online too so thats a plus. love him so much which all professors could be like him
                
                   Professor Shwiff is a great teacher. He has real world experience that he brings into the class. He challenges you to think in his class and to apply some of the concepts to your everyday life. He also has a good sense of humor. I advise taking in the Fall at Commerce and not at the Campus in Dallas if you like a more personal learning experience. 
                
                   Professor Shwiff was great he just wants you to get what he is teaching you.  Expect online class live sessions once a week.  He was awesome at teaching if you attend the class live if you do not you will more than likely fail miserably.   I actually learned the material in his class and will never forget it, although I may never do forecasting.
                
                   He is very intelligent.  He knows a lot about Econ and he knows how to explain things in an easy to follow fashion.  His class is tough, but rewarding.  I learned a lot, and I recommend others give him a shot.
                
                   Great teacher!!!! I actually looked forward going to his class. I took his ECO 562 on campus and didn't bother buying the book- he shows you everything you need to know.
                
                   Very good professor that really works with you.  He is extremely helpful and will bump your grade if you attend classes.  He is very helpful if you participate and attend lectures.  His reviews are pretty much the exams.  He is very thorough and helps make this subject much easier.  HIGHLY RECOMMEND.
                
                   Great Professor. Really teaches not just post the materials. He took 2 classes a week and mostly uses practical examples and clarifies the questions and doubts. Exams are simple and easy if you watch the lectures or attend the live classes. He makes the class interesting and you will really learn a lot form his experience and teaching style.
                
                   Dr. Shwiff is very helpful and an all around great professor. He has even tutored me in other subjects. He cares about his students and wants them to succeed.
                
                   Excellent instructor. Made sure that everyone new expectations and came back to class live to visit with students that needed help. He made sure that everyone knew how to do the assignment. Not an easy class but if you work hard it is worth the time. Would not have taken this class from anyone else.
                
                   Great professor. Very fair, workload manageable. Subject material is difficult, I would not done as well without the Dr. Shwiff's help.
                
                   Like the comments state, Dr. Schwiff is a great professor. I did not realize how interesting this would be or how interested I would be in an ECO class. If you have to take this course, he is the one you should sign up with. You have to work, but its not impossible.
                
                   What everyone else says, awesome professor. Just go to every class, listen and take notes, and you'll do fine. Don't waste your money on the book.
                
                   Dr. Shwiff is very knowledgeable and interacts well with his students. You are challenged but it is not impossible to do well if you read, show up, and take notes. You will learn...I highly recommend you take this course or any others he teaches. I got an A.
                
                   Awesome professor!  Teaches real world, not just things from a textbook.  A definite must.  Is more concerned about his students learning than just bogging them down with needless information.
                
                   Dr. Shwiff is an amazing instructor who truly cares about his students.  He is a great teacher who is o smart and works really hard.  He will not let you down and you MUST take his class!!!
                
                   Clear instruction, made work load manageable, would not have done well without his instruction. Highly recommended.
                
                   Awesome Professor of Tamu-C. Highly recommend this Prof.
                
                   You will regret taking anyone else for your MBA Econ requirement. Material is very dense, but Dr. Shwiff is masterful at deconstructing the material and teaching pure application. Excellent course. Highly recommend! Attend class weekly. Gives 3 exams, WATCH LIVE CLASS METICULOUSLY, and you'll do well. Hands down BEST PROFESSOR in the MBA program.
                
                   Great professor. Very clear, manageable work load (3 tests) and fair grading. Highly recommended!
                
                   Dr. Shwiff is the best professor I've had yet at TAMU-C. He knows the material very well and is able to articulate clearly. I would definately recommend him as a professor. The exams were fair and applicable to what was taught in class. Class was one night a week for about 2.5 hours. Great format!
                
                   I have taken many classes with TAMU-C and this class was the best managed class I have had. It was a Summer I course with three days a week of classlive sessions (2-3 hours each). Not complaining only commenting, because more online professors should take his lead. Fantastic experience and a great teacher! I would highly recommend this professor.
                
                   She is not a very good professor to take. Not clear during lectures you basically have to teach yourself during the semester. You have something due just about every day. You need to go to class but there is no need to pay attention it won't help.
                
                   The semester is not over yet but I can tell you that this was my hardest class this semester. It has nothing to do with Professor Miller. It is My Econ Lab. I hate it so much. I do wish she would at least give us an hour to take the quizzes. The tests are hard. Prepare to see material that is not even in the book. I read the entire chapters.
                
                   Professor Miller is very easy going and wants to help you. The homework is easy as well as the essay which will automatically give you a B or A- depending on how well you score on her exams. 
                
                   If you have basic comprehension, show up to class, and read your book sometimes you will do fine. Others have said here that she doesn't prepare you, but they mean she doesn't tell you answers for the test in class. If you are lazy and don't want to think, don't take Economics. One commenter "expects students to read, self study & perform." Crazy!
                
                   Strange class. It's online so the lectures are through a program called class live. They are 1-2 hours every week. I can't tell if its the disconnect of not being in the same room as the students, but she seems unready for every lecture and it feels like she is just improvising. If you read the textbook you will do fine though.
                
                   Professor Miller is a good professor. She responds promptly to emails, which is essential in a online class. She gives lots of extra credit. I made a 95 in the class. She has online lectures which help. Homework is all on MyEconLab which I loved and so are the exams. Some of the questions come from the homework, so pay attention while doing the HW.
                
                   I loved this class and Professor Miller is so sweet.
                
                   She was more interested in finishing her thesis than teaching class. It was online, but classlive wouldn't work (for all 40 of us). Her lectures were of poor quality. She does respond to emails in a timely manner. During bad weather she did offer extensions. When she doesn't grade discussion posts in a timely manner, she's more lax on grading.
                
                   She is a very fair professor. Gives a lot of extra credit. You must read the book and study. If you fall behind ask her for office time. She is will help you the students that are the n class and participate
                
                   Disorganized during class live sessions. Seems to never really get started or stay on topic. If they are not mandatory I would not waste my time. She will answer all emails but it may take time for her to respond. Tests are not hard. DO THE QUIZZES AND TESTS in My Econ Lab before you take her tests and it's a breeze. She drops a test grade.
                
                   This class was miserable. She doesn't know how to teach Economics and she is very off topic. All she talks about is her cows and her farm. Homework is easy but that's because you have three chances to do it right. However, tests are difficult and she doesn't even prepare you well. The questions on the test aren't even discussion questions.
                
                   This class sucked major balls. The test were horrible and she does not know how to explain anything. If you take her tests, good luck, because she doesn't even go over the materials on the test. Homeworks were easy, but that's because you can keep guessing, however, tests are stupid and difficult. Good luck surviving in this horrible class.
                
                   Would never take her online class again. Absolutely terrible. The text book did not help and the online tests were extremely too long for the time allowed. Would not recommend her
                
                   Disorganized and a little scatterbrained, but does not waste time on pointless assignments. Perfect course for self-teachers. She is understanding and will work with you throughout the course. Tests are straight from the text; class lives were unnecessary.
                
                   Ms Miller is a great professor. The key to getting her and her class is to most definitely read ahead and stay on top of current affairs because she uses real life situations to explain what is in the text and if you are not into current affairs you will be as confused as ever when she starts lecturing.Great professor!!!
                
                   I enjoyed the class, although i know a little about money and economics. Missed half the semester, but still did well on tests. Is unorganized, but is also willing to accept late work and will work with you. Class is interesting and encourages you to ask questions.
                
                   read your book and go to a tutor. you won't learn much in class (my notes from class were hardly ever relivent to the tests) luckily, she is easy on tests. she's always late to class so atleast you have a few extra mins to find parking.
                
                   I had his class as pre-req for my MBA but was extremely disappointed as the professor does not understand what she is doing in the class & what she wants to focus. Too much time is spent talking about things not relevant to the class & expects students to read, self study & perform. No support what-so-ever in providing answers to questions asked.
                
                   Worst instructor I have ever experienced.  Terrible.  Avoid this person's classes.
                
                   Confused and disconnected.  Boarders on unprofessional.
                
                   She does not respond to majority of her emails. If you take her online, she does not help explain assignments that you may have any questions over. Assigns 3 different assignments a week as well as other assignments in a different program, all due within two days of each other. 
                
                   This is a true graduate class.  Dr. Funderburk is a very knowledgeable professor, and generally clear in what he is looking for.  There are weekly online lectures, two exams, one project, and an optional term paper.  He gives you every opportunity to succeed, but doens't hand out grades either.  Take him, but be prepared to work. (Fall 2015).
                
                   Took this class during a summer session and it was hectic, but if you keep up with the reading and lectures, you will make it.  No textbook, just his notes, so saved me some money there.  Two exams (multiple choice), two papers, and one optional term paper.  Gives opportunity to earn extra points.  Responds to emails pretty quickly.  Nice guy.
                
                   His sessions are real, actual and smarts. He makes you think and provides you guidance. If you do bad in an assignment, he gives extra work (not easy) so you can catch up and dont let you behind in the learning journey. The material is somehow abstract but he makes it practical. Highly recommended Professor.
                
                   Poor instrctor. Waits to late to give test & material,  drones on with pitiful jokes,  useless. 
                
                   Very difficult class but the professor gave extra credits which helped me get a B. He gave us the option to do the final as a take home test. If you do your work and he sees that you are trying he will be very helpful when it comes to your grades. Getting a A is very difficult. In his class a B is 75.
                
                   He is a true Keynesian Economist and knows the subject of Economics better than most - he is on another level   He expects class to know basics: algebra intro to econ (hey its Grad sch)  This is one, if not, the most difficult course i have taken -     is dependable to attend class  live session -  answers emails and helps you understand concept  
                
                   Glad there was a live lecture. No required textbook made understanding the material tough. I bought a few books to help out .Prepare to study on your own. Replies quickly to emailed questions.
                
                   Terrible professor, does not teach, mostly professes about politics opposed to the actual subject matter.  If you can opt for ECO 562.
                
                   Awful teacher, did not respond to e-mails and he did not care how you fared in his class. Communication is key in an online class and he failed to keep up. His class live was a waste of time and only recommended websites to browse, worst class I have had yet!
                
                   The professor is probably a very good economist, but is not a great professor.  Be prepared to read a lot and teach yourself.  I missed an "A" by one point and have a fairly good background in Econ.  Achieving an "A" is difficult.
                
                   The man is a genius, but probably not the best at teaching. However, I thought he did a pretty good job of guiding us through the material. Exams were chalenging but carefully read the provided material, take good notes and you will be ok. I did the summer course, opted not to do the term paper and got an easy B.  (A would have been very dificult)
                
                   His summer on line class was fast and difficult. He had two 50 questions-multiple choice test (some true,false) and two assignments. This class is self-study with only couple of hours &quot;webinar&quot; discussions, which he goes off on tangents. Be ready to study and do the work!
                
                   His summer on line class was fast and clear. He had two 50 questions-multiple choice test (some true,false) and two assignments. He also helped out with special credit. This class is self-study with only couple of hours &quot;webinar&quot; discussions. Be ready to study and do the work!
                
                   Professor does not cover everything on the test in his lectures so make sure you read the book.
                
                   Bad teacher, good economist.
                
                   Class is a waste of time. Don't expect much out of the class. Teach yourself the material.
                
                   Knows material just doesn't know how to teach it. If you read the book and do the extra credit you'll be fine. Got the impression that he was always wanting to get out of class as quick as possible.
                
                   Take good notes and do all the extra credit.
                
                   Do not take him if you want to learn something!
                
                   This Macro class was so unfair. You were to write a term paper before the final, during a summer semester, then if you didn't have a 90 avg on the two exams, he wouldn't even look at the term paper, just tossed it. In this class an eco eastfield proffesor, also post mba gov acct, it was so unfair cause they did perfect and everyone else did C.Jerk.
                
                   He was a nice professor but his tests were pretty difficult. Attendance is mandatory. My advice acing his class would be to do the assigned readings and save the homework/quizzes, some of them appear on the exam. That is how I got an A
                
                   I didn't learn much economics in his class but I had a wonderful time and still got an A. He would be much better off as just a business teacher because he is so rounded. The online tests are hard, but if you go to the extra credit business seminars and show your interest in business you will end up with an A!
                
                   I would recommend Deaton for his online Eco class. He hold class live, which can be helpful. 20% of your grade is attendance for the class lives. HW is on MEL which I like. I did the HW and the study plan problems which helps for the exams. There is a paper worth 5 extra bonus points. Do the work and put forth the effort and you should make an A. 
                
                   I enjoyed Dr. Deaton's class. You will too if you have a sense of wry humor. Very hard course, but we had to work for what we got and that includes a participation grade. Attendance is Mandatory and if you have any questions then ask him. He isn't the stick in the mud that people portray him to be.
                
                   He is the best professor in tamuc. I like his style of teaching. He gets straight to the point and is always available to help students.
                
                   I ended up with a B in this class. At first I struggled because I did not read enough and I did not partake in the non mandatory study plan on MEL but if you do tthe study plan and read I am sure that you will get atleast a B but definitely an A. After talking with Professor Deaton he advised me to do the study plan and read the power points and I was able to make a B in this class. For that information , I am forever grateful!
                
                   Interesting character! Dry sense of humor. The only complain I have is that HW is open 2 days before the lecture which gives you then only 5 days to do the HW. Why not start the HW "after" the class as there is no way in hell anyone is doing it prior to the class. When asked about it, he simply said "no" without any logical explanation.
                
                   I won't pretend that this guy is the devil because he isn't, but this class is tough. He has lectures and even took extra time to work through any and all HW questions we needed help with. His tests are intense. Learn the material. Really learn it. He's rough around the edges, and not fun or interesting at all, but his class is easily passable.
                
                   Homework, Quizzes and Study Plan (lab) are far harder than the exams. Do all of this and the exams will be easy. Social Responsibility Paper added 0-5 points to your overall average. Graded on a weighted average of 20% on quiz, 30% on homework and 50% on exams. He stayed after class and helped me with the math. He's sarcastic get used to it.
                
                   He's a nice chap. Tests are exactly the same from everybody else in the class. Attendance isn't mandatory, so it's more of an independent class. Enjoyed it, easy, as long as you study hard and work hard.
                
                   I was worried about this class after reading the reviews. However, I found that it was easier than I thought. Do all the homework and read the book- you will be fine. As far as his personality, I think some of the people on here rating him can't recognize sarcasm.
                
                   I got an A in this class. He was nice during the lectures and provided live class to review for the tests. He allowed us to write an essay or take the final. I chose the essay and he gave me 100 points on it. I would definitely take from him again. I was actually nervous due to his prior ratings but it was not like others had said.
                
                   Horrible Professor. I do not recommend him. The class consists of 3 test and 3 test only. His test come straight from the book, but are very tricky. He gets mad if you ask any questions and sounds bored during the weekly webinars.
                
                   Hard Professor. I had him for ECO 501 and he was okay. He provided very little feedback in ECO 576. No virtual office, student lounge, quizzes, etc. Just three tests. Sink or swim
                
                   Worst professor at TAMU-Commerece.  Any question asked is met with a snide comment and a "this is graduate level economics, you should already know that".  He seems to take pride in making as many people drop as possible.  If you can make it past the first test then you should be able to get through the rest of the semester and pass the class.
                
                   Classes are interesting w/ lots of good info. However, these are long-winded sessions often exceeding 3 hrs. Most of the tests had questions from other chapters. If your test is on chapter 1-3, be sure to study chapter 4 too! (not joking).  You might want to review your algebra/statistic books before taking this class. Overall a hard class!
                
                   Very rude.  Any help is prefaced with a snide comment.  Intentionally words exam questions to be misleading.  Overall, not a good teacher.
                
                   Tom was very disrespectful and made us feel like we are worthless. Emailed him twice at the beginning of the semester regarding a question in syllabus and never heard back from him. Emailed him again before final exam and he asked me to listen to the Webinar but there's no log. I would not recommend anybody to take his class.waste of my time.
                
                   He has sarcastic personality that some people take as rude, apparently. He's very nice and helpful, always answers students questions in detail during class live meetings. You MUST do all required reading to pass, and even then he has a tendency to reword concepts so much that the answer is hard to get to. Just READ and you'll pass.
                
                   He talks to students and replies to emails as if we are stupid. Very rude
                
                   Dr. Wiggins really knows his stuff. I enjoyed 323, but it wasn't easy. Every lecture is important. If you miss even a single lecture, GET NOTES FROM SOMEONE. Here's a hint for anyone who's struggling: his exams are written in the same style as his homework. The assignments make a good predictor for how you'll do on exams. He also curves generously.
                
                   If you really want to learn economics, make sure you take it with Wiggins. If you're an econ minor or a lousy business student, do NOT take Wiggins. With that being said, he is probably one of the best profs I have had at tamu. He helped me become a much better student.
                
                   All I can say about Dr. Wiggins is you will learn a lot, but you will still struggle to pass. If not for his massive curving, I would have made a solid F.
                
                   This was the hardest class i have ever taken. He is very smart and he wants you to learn as much as possible. he will try to help you in every possible way. The only way to pass the class is if you study a lot and completely master each section. You will learn a lot from him.
                
                   Wiggins is perhaps the most intelligent person you'll ever meet.  get ready to learn because you will do a lot of  economics. You will Not pass if you try to memorize. You must study everyday before class because he calls on people to solve problems. Overall amazing professor but the course is extremely difficult. Incorporates a lot of Micro Theory
                
                   Dr Wiggins is an extremely smart guy. He has huge passion and it shows. This is a REALLY hard class but he will work  to answer all your questions and to make sure everybody understands before going on.  If you are willing to work hard as an Econ major and you really want to learn Economics, take him. His lectures are worthwhile.
                
                   AVOID LIKE THE PLAGUE! So Rude! If you value good grades and are a good student AVOID this Professor! I was told wonderful things about him only to sit in his class everyday and have these things proven wrong. ECON majors take another prof! If you take him do it at your own risk. I don't understand how he has a B- grade average.
                
                   He is a good teacher although he is the hardest teacher for the class and makes sure of that, the lectures were vary interesting and fun although no mater how well you think you know the information you are wrong and if you get a 100 on a question worth 30 points you can expect to only get 25  for it, if you take him make sure you have a q drop
                
                   The class is tough, but Wiggins makes sure each and every person in the class understands the material before moving on. Very smart guy, and lectures are interesting, a couple of lectures are even student choice. Take good notes and you should be fine, but like i said, the class is very difficult. 
                
                   Absolutely awful. The material he teaches in class is not at all how his exams are. I went to every single lecture. And took pages of notes and still ended up with an F in the class. I would not recommend him anyone. Sure he cares about teaching ECON but if you care about your GPA stay away from this guy. -Best of luck
                
                   He knows what hes doing and he definitely has a passion for economics, which helps keep it interesting.  He goes out of his way to make sure that everyone in the class understands the material.
                
                   Prof. Tian does not need to be teaching in America. With his lack of English, students' grades suffer. Although, if you stick it out, he promises a passing grade, but that is not always the case. He obviously knows his matireal, but he is just not good at teaching it. Tests are hard: half MultiChoice and half free response (math and graphs).
                
                   Awesome teacher. Kind of nerdy and dorky at times but he's always available to help whenever possible. His tests are average and there's no suprises on them. If you go to class everyday then you should grasp the material well enough to get a B in the class.
                
                   Dr. Naufal is easily one of my favorite professors! His tests are tough, but his grading style is in favor of his students. His response time on emails is weird in how fast it is, and he is always available to meet if you're struggling or have questions. He tries to add jokes to his lectures to keep things interesting. Great professor!
                
                   You can fail every test and still pass. Don't get me wrong,  you still have to work for your grade. He drops the lowest test score, gives tons of extra credit, and there are many opportunities to improve your grade. I actually learned in this class!  He is a great professor. Take his class!
                
                   James Mjelde is an OK professor. He doesn't wear a mic in class so be sure to sit in the front to hear him. He posts old tests online so be sure to study those as they are helpful. MAKE SURE that you purchase an iclicker before the first day and bring it to class every time. Clicker points and extra credit will save you. Go to class every time!
                
                   It's a fairly easy course if you actually come to class and prepare for the tests. Don't procrastinate too much and you'll do fine.
                
                   Karakaplan is very knowledgeable and he really knows what he's talking about. He goes in depth and has a sense of humor, making the subject tolerable if you're not a fan of economics. His expectations are clearly stated from the beginning, so there's no confusion. He also makes it clear that he does not round up grades.
                
                   EXCELLENT professor. I only used the book when I missed a class. Exams are easy as long as you pay attention, take notes and get a decent amount of studying in. He's a young guy who's actually pretty funny. He easily held my attention. I'd definitely recommend him.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   
                
                   There are 3 exams, your lowest exam is dropped. That leaves the other 2 to be averaged together. So if you study his previous exams from other semesters and understand how to do the material you will do great. His questions from other exams are repeated so it is a great source. He can be confusing at times but his class isn't that hard. Just study!
                
                   Really hard class. Mumbles when he speaks and talks in circles. He writes his notes, and his handwriting is hard to read. Had several mistakes on his final and had to correct while we were testing, Would not take again nor recommend 
                
                   I believe Professor Campbell is passionate and knowledgeable about Econ, but not good at teaching it. I found the tests confusing and his office hours made things worse. As an Ag. Econ major I have done well with econ but barely passed his class. 4.0 helps a lot, but his test questions are unpredictable. Book does not help at all. 
                
                   Your only grades in the class will be 2 exams and a final then he drops your lowest and averages the other 2 together. Online practice is provided, but is almost no help on the exams.  You really have to attend class to do well on the tests because they're based of his lectures.  The tests are worded poorly and are actually pretty difficult. 
                
                   Lectures are long and hard to pay attention..  They are confusing and frustrating (guess that's why I have a hard time paying attention).  He writes notes as he lectures and they're usually hard to read.. He's very knowledgeable and passionate about economics but doesn't do a very good job teaching it... Final is optional; lowest test grade dropped
                
                   While he does seem very knowledgeable about economics, he doesn't know how to teach it, nor does the book correspond to the lectures much. I went to his office hours at one point and I didn't ever go again because he made me feel like a bit of an idiot even though I was actively trying to learn. I would not recommend this professor.
                
                   Very petty, much like a child. Long lectures, doesn't always clarify and makes you feel dumb for asking. Simplistic lectures, but his tests, not so much. Posts "help" but never posts the answers so you never learn! Would not take him again-- ever. 
                
                   I actually find campbell to be pretty funny. His lectures are kind of confusing but if you go to 4.0 and go you shouldn't have a problem with the tests. There are 3 tests, but lowest grade is dropped so if you do well on the first 2 you won't have to take the final. I would take him for econ again
                
                   Campbell has an extremely strange personality and seems to use the class to prove HIS intelligence as opposed to teaching YOU. His lectures do not have direction and the book does not correspond with his syllabus. That being said, you won't have to go to class if you understand Econ. If not, DO NOT TAKE HIM.
                
                   BJ Campbell is obviously passionate about economics and very knowledgeable, however, he can't teach it. He is never able to answer questions, and if he tries you usually end up more confused. In a sentence, the book says one thing, he says another thing and the test says something else, so it's just a guessing game. 
                
                   Love this man. Made my freshman year awesome and easy! Very generous grader, gave us 13 bonus points on the first exam, then 6 on the second one. There's only two exams and a final, but final is optional. I loved his lectures and they cover more than is needed for the tests, and usually he keeps them entertaining and inspiring. 
                
                   The actual physical textbook (about $140) wasn't useful, though having the online version would have been for the answers to practice problems. Most people didn't come to class, tests were simple, non-cumulative,  and averaging an A on the tests exempted you from the final.
                
                   Don't take unless you absolutely have to! His lectures are very off topic and at times relate nothing to what is on the test. His handwritten notes are very hard to read and copy for yourself. He is very unclear and is always having to change what he has said or written because it is wrong. I would not recommend at all!
                
                   I just don't think she knew how to lecture in front of 75+ students... Her accent threw me off, but READ THE BOOK. Her lecture slides are straight from the textbook slides on the official website. I stopped going regardless of participation points and quizzes: I got a B.
                
                   I really liked her class shes very understanding if you have an emergency gave alot of extra credit out for my class yes you have to read and go to class to pass but everything she goes over is exactly whats on the test. the final was optional if you felt you had a good enough grade to pass with out taking it. 
                
                   You will most likely need to read out of the text book because it is really difficult to pay attention in class. I don't have ADD & I have never had a problem paying attention before. She is SUPER NICE and knows her stuff, but she needs to interact with the class more instead of just speaking to us. She is willing to work with you & super friendly.
                
                   The worst A&M prof I have EVER had. She says she gives pop quizzes/attendance quizzes for extra credit but didn't add it in at the end anyways. First two tests were okay, then the final was cummulative along with an additional 7 new chapters we had never been tested on. I do not recommend her AT ALL.
                
                   She was a fairly difficult professor to both understand and get a good grade in, her lectures come straight from the textbook but her test questions come from a lot of not from the textbook material like what the U.S. economy did in 2001 and different scenarios. wouldn't recommend
                
                   I do not recommend this professor. Lectures are extremely boring and out of the book, tests are fairly difficult, and she screws very important things up. She put the wrong textbook in the syllabus and didn't inform us of this until it was too late for me to return it. She also gave me a final grade of C when I had a B average. Take someone else!
                
                   Very hard to pay attention to her lectures. Basically just reads off the slides and never really does anything else but show examples. Seriously, take another teacher if you don't mind finding it really hard to pay attention and concentrate. I struggled and have taken it in the past
                
                   She is nice, but one of the worst professors I've had at A&M. I am starting to think the Economics department needs some help. But anyway, there were 3 tests. The first two were easy and then on the last one she made it noncumulative and WAY too difficult. Also, she is EXTREMELY boring. I could never pay attention. drops 2 hw grades
                
                   She is nice. Lectures are not very helpful because she is difficult to understand, plus her lectures are directly from the textbook. There is homework each week that is pretty tricky. Exams are not too bad, but it's hard to figure out some of her questions. Sometimes she gave extra credit for attendance or for answering practice questions right.
                
                   Takes attendance daily for extra credit. Teaches straight from the textbook. Posts practice questions and homework (not for an actual grade) online and uses those exact questions on her exams. There were 6 quizzes in class but 2 lowest grades are dropped.
                
                   Enjoyed his class a lot, really easy no reading. Barely studied got a B+.
                
                   Noah was definitley my favorite prof the semester. Tests were clear cut and he gives out reviews that can help you on the tests. He also lead a study session for the final which I'm sure helped a lot of people. Homework is a gimme if you just do it and it's a big part of your grade. 5/5 would take again.
                
                   Great class. Take it! 'nuf said.
                
                   Awesome Professor! This is his first year teaching, and he is one of my favorite professors, 100% would take him again. 25% for homework's, which are funny and you WILL get a 100 on if you just try, and 25% for each of the 3 exams, all of which I got an A on. He loves econ and tries so hard for all of his students to make it easy and fun! TAKE HIM!
                
                   He is brand new to teaching so he really cares and tries to make class not as painful. Gives reviews that are very similar to the test and if you don't get 100s on the homework grade, you're just lazy. The only reason he didn't give extra credit is because so many people had A's and he didn't think people needed it.
                
                   Noah is super genuine, and there for his students. He isn't just one of those professors who lectures, and thats it. He actually cares about his students, and how they're doing. Class is boring, but worth going too. He tries to make class fun and enjoyable. I love noah & would definitely take him for another econ class.
                
                   Homework counts for 25% of grade and three tests that each count for 25%. There's no reason you shouldn't get 100s on all of the homework because it feeds you the same questions until you get the grade you want. Tests are not cumulative. He is young and genuinely cares about how well his students are doing and their opinions.
                
                   I had to work my butt off just to pull out with a C at the end of the semester. While studying the old tests works great, he WILL reword questions at least two times every test just to screw with you, but if you take the old tests multiple times and reread like crazy, you can come out with a B or maybbeeee an A
                
                   My friend took his class last semester and made an A. I just finished this class. The class is extremly easy. I almost get a perfect score. As long as you study the old tests, you will get an A. It's not necessary to go to 4.0. He gives you bonus if you attend the class.
                
                   If you like theory, get ready.  Allen loves theory and loves to reword material to trick you.  Go to class, take notes, and print the old exams.  Then go see Doug at 4.0 & GO!  He'll make you understand it MUCH better!
                
                   Lectures are mandatory but in all honesty this is not a class you should miss anyways since the material will be tough if you get left behind.  To prepare for the tests I would read my notes and go over the OLD TESTS, I then highlighted what I didn't know on them and then re-studied.  I usually study last minute but I aced the exams when I did this
                
                   Well at least we know he knows economics, us students on the other hand might have complications.  Definately go to 4.0 and go and do the old exams, I had to work my tail off for my B.  Wouldnt recommend him.
                
                   Definitley study the old tests.
                
                   Dry lectures, takes role, gives 2 bonus pts for less than 3 absences. key to success: GO OVER OLD TESTS! new tests R changed a lot so you have to understand the concepts quite well. I really recommend 4.0&Go tutoring! does an AMAZING job explaining and streamlining all the drab from class. i failed the first test, started tutoring, aced the rest!
                
                   Posts old exams that definitely help when studying for upcoming exams. But lectures are boring and dry with the exception of the occaisional &quot;butter&quot; anecdote. Did best learning by reading the book.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   smart man, puts pasts exams up to study...use them!
                
                   he's a really nice guy, he always let my class out early too.
                
                   Study his old tests, they're just like his current ones. He gets the point across, but still isn't a very good lecturer. Boring.
                
                   Very difficult, but I learned TONS!!  Work hard and make a B probably...
                
                   He makes the class difficult. Boring Lectures. Many failed- many did not make above a C
                
                   No Comments
                
                   No Comments
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Hard class, but he is very willing to help you and is great at giving examples that clarify.
                
                   lectures are dry and most students go to 4.0 to make it through the class, grad assistant doesn't help any better on their study sessions either. prides himself on trick questions and everyone studies old tests, what a way to teach!
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Tests are very tough. Several discussion posts are required. Paper due at the end of the semester.
                
                   Does  student learning projects. aside from your required homework and attendance, you will be assigned to volunteer (albeit a tiny amount) 5hrs of community service for a non-profit so that you can write a report on how the economics of a non-prof organization works.  good teacher. clear. helpful. but don't get on his bad side. 
                
                   Great teacher for Econ.
                
                   Helpful prof and interesting class.  You can always ask questions and even stop by his office.  
                
                   Good professor. Made me more interested in economics.
                
                   All you have to do is show up, do the hw, and use the notes to study.  Good instructor who wants the students to do well.  Go to his office anytime with questions.
                
                   I disagree with the reviewer from 6/25/13.  Dr. Meredith does everything he can to help his students understand the material. If the online program is too confusing, you need remedial help for basic computer skills - and you probably should not take an online course. It's impossible to use all the resources for this class and fail.
                
                   He uses a separate online class other than WT along with WT so it can get confusing. I don't feel like he explains the material well.
                
                   He really wants his students to do well.  Just go to class, study the notes, do the homework.
                